Nebraska, session 109, LB473.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-2-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 8-602, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
8-602 The Director of Banking and Finance shall charge and collect
fees for certain services rendered by the Department of Banking and
Finance according to the following schedule:
(1) For filing and examining articles of incorporation, articles of
association, and bylaws, except credit unions, one hundred dollars, and
for credit unions, fifty dollars;
(2) For filing and examining an amendment to articles of
incorporation, articles of association, and bylaws, except credit unions,
fifty dollars, and for credit unions, fifteen dollars;
(3) For issuing to banks, credit card banks, trust companies, and
building and loan associations a charter, authority, or license to do
business in this state, a sum which shall be determined on the basis of
one dollar and fifty cents for each one thousand dollars of authorized
capital, except that the minimum fee in each case shall be two hundred
twenty-five dollars;
(4) For issuing to digital asset depositories under the Nebraska
Financial Innovation Act a charter to do business in this state, the sum
of fifty thousand dollars;
(5) For issuing an executive officer's or loan officer's license,
fifty dollars at the time of the initial license, except credit unions
for which the fee shall be twenty-five dollars at the time of the initial
license;
(6) For affixing certificate and seal, five dollars;
(7) For making substitution of securities held by it and issuing a
receipt, fifteen dollars;
(8) For issuing a certificate of approval to a credit union, ten
dollars;
(9) For investigating the applications required by sections 8-117,
8-120, 8-331, and 8-2402 and the documents required by section 8-201, the
-3-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
cost of such examination, investigation, and inspection, including all
legal expenses and the cost of any hearing transcript, with a minimum fee
under (a) sections 8-117, 8-120, and 8-2402 of two thousand five hundred
dollars, (b) section 8-331 of two thousand dollars, and (c) section 8-201
of one thousand dollars. The department may require the applicant to
procure and give a surety bond in such principal amount as the department
may determine and conditioned for the payment of the fees provided in
this subdivision;
(10) For the handling of pledged securities as provided in sections
8-210 , 8-2727, and 8-3022 at the time of the initial deposit of such
securities, one dollar and fifty cents for each thousand dollars of
securities deposited and a like amount on or before January 15 each year
thereafter. The fees shall be paid by the entity pledging the securities;
(11) For investigating an application to move its location within
the city or village limits of its original license or charter for banks,
trust companies, and building and loan associations, two hundred fifty
dollars;
(12) For investigating an application under subdivision (6) of
section 8-115.01, five hundred dollars;
(13) For investigating an application for approval to establish or
acquire a branch pursuant to section 8-157 or 8-2103 or to establish a
mobile branch pursuant to section 8-157, two hundred fifty dollars;
(14) For investigating a notice of acquisition of control under
subsection (1) of section 8-1502, five hundred dollars;
(15) For investigating an application for a cross-industry merger
under section 8-1510, five hundred dollars;
(16) For investigating an application for a merger of two state
banks, a merger of a state bank and a national bank in which the state
bank is the surviving entity, or an interstate merger application in
which the Nebraska state chartered bank is the resulting bank, five
hundred dollars;
-4-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(17) For investigating an application or a notice to establish a
branch trust office, five hundred dollars;
(18) For investigating an application or a notice to establish a
representative trust office, five hundred dollars;
(19) For investigating an application to establish a credit union
branch under section 21-1725.01, two hundred fifty dollars;
(20) For investigating an applicant under section 8-1513, five
thousand dollars;
(21) For investigating a request to extend a conditional bank
charter under section 8-117, one thousand dollars; and
(22) For investigating an application to establish a branch office,
for a merger or an acquisition of control, or for a request to extend a
conditional charter for a digital asset depository, five hundred dollars.
Sec. 2. Section 8-2701, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2701 Sections 8-2701 to 8-2742 8-2747 shall be known and may be
cited as the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Sec. 3. Section 8-2702, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2702 For purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act: , the
definitions found in sections 8-2703 to 8-2723 shall be used.
(1) Acting in concert means persons knowingly acting together with a
common goal of jointly acquiring control of a licensee whether or not
pursuant to an express agreement;
(2) Applicant means a person filing an application for a license
under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act;
(3) Authorized delegate means a person designated by the licensee to
engage in money transmission on behalf of the licensee;
(4) Average daily money transmission liability means the amount of
the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in this state
at the end of each day in a given period of time, added together, and
-5-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
divided by the total number of days in the given period of time. For
purposes of calculating average daily money transmission liability under
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act for any licensee required to do so,
the given period of time shall be each calendar quarter;
(5) Closed loop stored value means stored value that is redeemable
by the issuer of such stored value only for goods or services provided by
the issuer or affiliates of such issuer or franchisees of the issuer or
affiliates of such franchisees, except to the extent the stored value is
required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for the cash value of
the stored value;
(6)(a) Control means:
(i) Direct or indirect power over the vote of at least twenty-five
percent of the outstanding voting shares or voting interests of a
licensee or person in control of a licensee;
(ii) The power to elect or appoint a majority of key individuals,
executive officers, managers, directors, trustees, or other persons that
have managerial authority of a person in control of a licensee; or
(iii) The power to exercise, directly or indirectly, a controlling
influence over the management or policies of a licensee or person in
control of a licensee.
(b) For purposes of determining the percentage of a person
controlled by any other person, the person's interest shall be aggregated
with the interest of any other immediate family member, including the
person's spouse, parents, children, siblings, mothers-in-law, fathers-in
law, sons-in-law, daughters-in-law, brothers-in-law, and sisters-in-law,
and any other person who shares such person's residence;
(7) Department means the Department of Banking and Finance;
(8) Director means the Director of Banking and Finance;
(9) Eligible rating means a credit rating of any of the three
highest rating categories provided by an eligible rating service, whereby
each category may include rating category modifiers such as plus or minus
-6-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
for Standard and Poor's Corporation or the equivalent for any other
eligible rating service. Long-term credit ratings are deemed eligible if
the rating is equal to A- or higher by Standard and Poor's Corporation,
or the equivalent from any other eligible rating service. Short-term
credit ratings are deemed eligible if the rating is equal to or higher
than A-2 or SP-2 by Standard and Poor's Corporation or the equivalent
from any other eligible rating service. In the event that ratings differ
among eligible rating services, the highest rating shall apply when
determining whether a security bears an eligible rating.
(10) Eligible rating service means any nationally recognized
statistical rating organization approved by the Securities and Exchange
Commission and any other organization designated by the director by rule
or order;
(11) Federally insured depository financial institution means a
bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust company, savings
association, savings bank, industrial bank, or industrial loan company
organized under the laws of the United States or any state of the United
States, when such bank, credit union, savings and loan association, trust
company, savings association, savings bank, industrial bank, or
industrial loan company has federally insured deposits;
(12) In this state means at a physical location within this state
for a transaction requested in person. For a transaction requested
electronically or by telephone, the provider of money transmission may
determine if the person requesting the transaction is in this state by
relying on other information provided by such person regarding the
location of the individual's residential address or the entity's
principal place of business or other physical address location and any
records associated with such person that the provider of money
transmission may have that indicate the location of the individual's
residential address or the entity's principal place of business or other
physical address location, including, but not limited to, an address
-7-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
associated with an account;
(13) Individual means a natural person;
(14) Key individual means any individual ultimately responsible for
establishing or directing policies and procedures of the licensee, such
as an executive officer, manager, director, or trustee;
(15) Licensee means a person licensed under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act;
(16) Material litigation means litigation, that according to United
States generally accepted accounting principles, is significant to a
person's financial health and would be required to be disclosed in the
person's annual audited financial statements, report to shareholders, or
similar records;
(17) Model Money Transmission Modernization Act means the Model
Money Transmission Modernization Act approved for state adoption by the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors Board of Directors that sets
nationwide standards, including net worth, surety bond, and permissible
investments requirements, to modernize the supervision and regulation of
money transmitters;
(18) Monetary value means a medium of exchange, whether or not
redeemable in money;
(19) Money means a medium of exchange that is authorized or adopted
by the United States or a foreign government. Money includes a monetary
unit of account established by an intergovernmental organization or by
agreement between two or more governments;
(20)(a) Money transmission means any of the following:
(i) Selling or issuing payment instruments to a person located in
this state;
(ii) Selling or issuing stored value to a person located in this
state; and
(iii) Receiving money for transmission from a person located in this
state.
-8-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(b) Money transmission includes payroll processing services. Money
transmission does not include the provision solely of online or
telecommunications services or network access;
(21) Multistate licensing process means any agreement entered into
by and among state regulators relating to coordinated processing of
applications for money transmission licenses, applications for the
acquisition of control of a licensee, control determinations, or notice
and information requirements for a change of key individuals;
(22) Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry, also known as the
Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, developed by the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors and the American Association of
Residential Mortgage Regulators and owned and operated by the State
Regulatory Registry LLC, or any successor or affiliated entity, for the
licensing and registration of persons in financial services industries;
(23)(a) Outstanding money transmission obligation means:
(i) Any payment instrument or stored value issued or sold by the
licensee to a person located in the United States or reported as sold by
an authorized delegate of the licensee to a person that is located in the
United States that has not yet been paid or refunded by or for the
licensee or has been escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned
property laws; or
(ii) Any money received for transmission by the licensee or an
authorized delegate in the United States from a person located in the
United States that has not been received by the payee or refunded to the
sender or has been escheated in accordance with applicable abandoned
property laws.
(b) For purposes of subdivision (23) of this section, in the United
States includes, to the extent applicable, a person in any state,
territory, or possession of the United States; the District of Columbia;
the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico; or a United States military installation
-9-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
that is located in a foreign country;
(24) Payment instrument means a written or electronic check, draft,
money order, traveler's check, or other written or electronic instrument
for the transmission or payment of money or monetary value, whether or
not negotiable. Payment instrument does not include stored value or any
instrument that:
(a) Is redeemable by the issuer only for goods or services provided
by the issuer or affiliates of such issuer or franchisees of the issuer
or affiliates of such franchisees except to the extent the instrument is
required by applicable law to be redeemable in cash for the cash value of
the instrument; or
(b) Is not sold publicly but issued and distributed as part of a
loyalty, rewards, or promotional program;
(25) Payroll processing services means receiving money for
transmission pursuant to a contract with a person to deliver wages or
salaries, make payment of payroll taxes to state and federal agencies,
make payments relating to employee benefit plans, or make distributions
of other authorized deductions from wages or salaries. Payroll processing
services does not include an employer performing payroll processing
services on the employer's own behalf or on behalf of an affiliate of the
employer;
(26) Person means any individual, general partnership, limited
partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, association,
joint stock corporation, or other corporate entity identified by the
director;
(27) Receipt means a paper receipt, electronic record, or other
written confirmation;
(28) Receiving money for transmission or money received for
transmission means receiving money or monetary value in the United States
for transmission within or outside the United States by electronic or
other means;
-10-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(29) Remit means to make direct payments of money to a licensee or a
representative of a licensee authorized to receive money or to deposit
money in a bank in an account specified by the licensee; and
(30) Stored value means monetary value representing a claim against
the issuer of the stored value evidenced by an electronic or digital
record, and that is intended and accepted for use as a means of
redemption for money or monetary value, or payment for goods or services.
Stored value includes, but is not limited to, prepaid access as defined
by 31 C.F.R. part 1010.100. Notwithstanding the foregoing, stored value
does not include a payment instrument or closed loop stored value, or
stored value not sold publicly but issued and distributed as part of a
loyalty, rewards, or promotional program.
Sec. 4. Section 8-2703, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2703 The Nebraska Money Transmitters Act does not apply to:
(1) An operator of a payment system to the extent that such operator
provides processing, clearing, or settlement services, between or among
persons exempted from the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act under this
section or licensees, in connection with wire transfers, credit card
transactions, debit card transactions, stored value transactions,
automated clearinghouse transfers, or similar funds transfers;
(2) A person appointed as an agent of a payee to collect and process
a payment from a payor to the payee for goods or services, other than
money transmission, provided to the payor by the payee, provided that:
(a) There exists a written agreement between the payee and the agent
directing the agent to collect and process payments from payors on the
behalf of the payee;
(b) The payee holds the agent out to the public as accepting
payments for goods or services on the behalf of the payee; and
(c) Payment for the goods or services is treated as received by the
payee upon receipt by the agent so that the payor's obligation is
-11-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
extinguished and there is no risk of loss to the payor if the agent fails
to remit the funds to the payee;
(3) A person that acts as an intermediary by processing payments
between an entity that has directly incurred an outstanding money
transmission obligation to a sender, and the sender's designated
recipient, provided that the entity:
(a) Is properly licensed or exempt from licensing requirements of
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act;
(b) Provides a receipt, electronic record, or other written
confirmation to the sender identifying the entity as the provider of
money transmission in the transaction; and
(c) Bears sole responsibility to satisfy the outstanding money
transmission obligation to the sender, including the obligation to make
the sender whole in connection with any failure to transmit the funds to
the designated recipient of the sender;
(4) The United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof or any agent of the United States or any department, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
(5) Money transmission by the United States Postal Service or by an
agent of the United States Postal Service;
(6) A state, county, or city or any governmental agency, political
subdivision, or instrumentality of a state, or any agent of a state,
county, or city or any governmental agency, political subdivision, or
instrumentality of a state;
(7) A federally insured depository financial institution, bank
holding company, office of an international banking corporation, foreign
bank that establishes a federal branch pursuant to the International Bank
Act of 1978, corporation organized pursuant to the Bank Service
Corporation Act, or corporation organized under the Edge Act;
(8) Electronic funds transfer of governmental benefits for a
federal, state, county, or other governmental agency by a contractor on
-12-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
behalf of the United States or a department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof, or on behalf of a state, county, or other governmental
subdivision, agency, or instrumentality thereof;
(9) A board of trade designated as a contract market under the
Federal Commodity Exchange Act or a person that, in the ordinary course
of business, provides clearance and settlement services for a board of
trade to the extent of such person's operation as or for such a board;
(10) A person registered as a futures commission merchant under the
federal commodities laws to the extent of such person's operation as a
merchant;
(11) A person registered as a securities broker-dealer under federal
or state securities laws to the extent of such person's operation as a
broker-dealer;
(12) An individual employed by a licensee, authorized delegate, or
any person exempted from the licensing requirements of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act when acting within the scope of employment, under the
supervision of the licensee, authorized delegate, or exempted person, as
an employee and not as an independent contractor;
(13) A person expressly appointed as a third-party service provider
to or agent of an entity exempt under subdivision (7) of this section,
solely to the extent that:
(a) Such service provider or agent is engaging in money transmission
on behalf of and pursuant to a written agreement with the exempt entity
that sets forth the specific functions that the service provider or agent
is to perform; and
(b) The exempt entity assumes all risk of loss and all legal
responsibility for satisfying the outstanding money transmission
obligations owed to purchasers and holders of the outstanding money
transmission obligations upon receipt of the purchaser's or holder's
money or monetary value by the service provider or agent;
(14) A person, firm, corporation, or association licensed in this
-13-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
state and acting within this state within the scope of a license:
(a) As a collection agency pursuant to the Collection Agency Act;
(b) As a credit services organization pursuant to the Credit
Services Organization Act; or
(c) To engage in the debt management business pursuant to sections
69-1201 to 69-1217;
(15) A charter issued under the Nebraska Financial Innovation Act;
and
(16) A person exempt by regulation or order if the director finds
such exemption to be in the public interest and that the regulation of
such person is not necessary for the purposes of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act.
Applicant means a person filing an application for a license under
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Sec. 5. Section 8-2704, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2704 The director may require that any person claiming to be
exempt from licensing under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act pursuant
to section 8-2703 provide information and documentation to the director
demonstrating that such person qualifies for exemption. Authorized
delegate means an entity designated by the licensee or an exempt entity
under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act to engage in the business of
money transmission on behalf of the licensee or exempt entity.
Sec. 6. Section 8-2705, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2705 (1) In order to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act, the director may, subject to subsections (1) and (2) of
section 8-2706:
(a) Enter into agreements or relationships with other government
officials or federal and state regulatory agencies and regulatory
associations in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory
-14-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
burden by standardizing methods or procedures and sharing resources,
records, or related information obtained under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act;
(b) Use, hire, contract, or employ analytical systems, methods, or
software to examine or investigate any person subject to the Nebraska
Money Transmitters Act;
(c) Accept, from other state or federal governmental agencies or
officials, licensing, examination, or investigation reports made by such
other state or federal governmental agencies or officials; and
(d) Accept audit reports made by an independent certified public
accountant or other qualified third-party auditor for an applicant or
licensee and incorporate the audit report in any report of examination or
investigation.
(2) The director shall have the broad administrative authority to
administer, interpret, and enforce the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act,
to adopt and promulgate rules or regulations implementing the act, and to
recover the cost of administering and enforcing the act by imposing and
collecting proportionate and equitable fees and costs associated with
applications, examinations, investigations, and other actions required to
achieve the purposes of the act.
Breach of security of the system means unauthorized acquisition of
data that compromises the security, confidentiality, or integrity of the
information maintained by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and
Registry, its affiliates, or its subsidiaries.
Sec. 7. Section 8-2706, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2706 (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, all information or reports obtained by the director from an
applicant, licensee, or authorized delegate, related to an examination or
investigation, on behalf of, or for the use of the director, are not
public record and are not subject to disclosure pursuant to sections
-15-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
84-712 to 84-712.09.
(2) The director may disclose information not otherwise subject to
disclosure under subsection (1) of this section to a representative of
state or federal agencies who promises in a record that the
representative will maintain the confidentiality of the information or if
the director finds that the disclosure is reasonably necessary for the
protection and interest of the public pursuant to sections 84-712 to
84-712.09.
(3) This section does not prohibit the director from disclosing to
the public a list of all licensees or the aggregated financial or
transactional data concerning those licensees.
(4) Information contained in the records of the department that is
public record and may be made available to the public either on the
department's website, upon receipt by the department of a written
request, or in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry
shall include:
(a) The name, business address, telephone number, and unique
identifier of any licensee;
(b) The business address of any registered agent of a licensee for
service;
(c) The name, business address, and telephone number of all
authorized delegates;
(d) The terms of, or a copy of, any bond filed by a licensee,
provided that confidential information, including, but not limited to,
prices and fees for such bond is redacted;
(e) Copies of any nonconfidential final orders of the department
relating to any violation of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or the
rules and regulations implementing the act; and
(f) Imposition of an administrative fine or penalty under the act.
Control means the power, directly or indirectly, to direct the
management or policies of a licensee, whether through ownership of
-16-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
securities, by contract, or otherwise. Any person who (1) has the power
to elect a majority of executive officers, managers, directors, trustees,
or other persons exercising managerial authority of a licensee or any
person in control of a licensee, (2) directly or indirectly has the right
to vote ten percent or more of a class of stock or directly or indirectly
has the power to sell or direct the sale of ten percent or more of a
class of stock, (3) in the case of a limited liability company, is a
managing member, or (4) in the case of a partnership, has the right to
receive, upon dissolution, or has contributed, ten percent or more of the
capital, is presumed to control that licensee.
Sec. 8. Section 8-2707, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2707 (1) The director may conduct an examination or investigation
of a licensee or authorized delegate or otherwise take independent action
authorized by the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or by a rule or
regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the act as
reasonably necessary or appropriate to administer and enforce the act,
rules and regulations implementing the act, or other applicable law,
including the Bank Secrecy Act and the Uniting and Strengthening America
by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct
Terrorism Act of 2001. The director may:
(a) Conduct an examination as the director may reasonably require;
(b) Conduct an examination in conjunction with an examination
conducted by representatives of other state agencies or agencies of
another state or of the federal government;
(c) Accept the examination report of another state agency or an
agency of another state or of the federal government, or a report
prepared by an independent accounting firm, which on being accepted, is
considered for all purposes as an official report of the director; and
(d) Summon and examine under oath a key individual or employee of a
licensee or authorized delegate and require the person to produce records
-17-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
regarding any matter related to the condition and business of the
licensee or authorized delegate.
(2) A licensee or authorized delegate shall provide, and the
director shall have full and complete access to, all records the director
may reasonably require to conduct a complete examination. The records
shall be provided at a location and in a format specified by the
director. The director may utilize multistate record production standards
and examination procedures when such standards will reasonably achieve
the requirements of this subsection.
(3) Upon receipt by a licensee, an authorized delegate, or any other
person of a notice of investigation or inquiry request for information
from the department, the licensee, authorized delegate, or other person
shall respond within twenty-one calendar days after receipt. Failure to
respond is a violation of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act. Each day a
licensee, authorized delegate, or other person fails to respond shall
constitute a separate violation of the act.
(4) If the director finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, that any person has
violated the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act pursuant to subsection (3)
of this section, the director may order such person to pay an
administrative fine of not more than five thousand dollars for each
separate violation and the costs of investigation.
(5) Unless otherwise directed by the director, a licensee shall pay
all costs reasonably incurred in connection with an examination of the
licensee or the licensee's authorized delegates.
Controlling person means any person in control of a licensee.
Sec. 9. Section 8-2708, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2708 (1) The director is authorized to participate in multistate
supervisory processes established between states and coordinated through
the Conference of State Bank Supervisors and Money Transmitter Regulators
-18-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
Association and any affiliates and successors thereof for all licensees
that hold licenses in this state and other states. As a participant in
multistate supervision, the director may:
(a) Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with other state
and federal regulators in accordance with section 8-2706;
(b) Enter into written cooperation, coordination, or information-
sharing contracts or agreements with organizations, the membership of
which is made up of state or federal governmental agencies; and
(c) Cooperate, coordinate, and share information with organizations,
the membership of which is made up of state or federal governmental
agencies, provided that the organizations agree in writing to maintain
the confidentiality and security of the shared information in accordance
with section 8-2706.
(2) Nothing in this section constitutes a waiver of the director's
authority to conduct an examination or investigation or otherwise take
independent action authorized by the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a
rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the
act to enforce compliance with applicable state or federal law.
(3) A joint examination or investigation, or acceptance of an
examination or investigation report, does not waive an examination
assessment provided for in the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
Department means the Department of Banking and Finance.
Sec. 10. Section 8-2709, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2709 (1) A person may not engage in the business of money
transmission or advertise, solicit, or hold such person out as providing
money transmission unless the person is licensed under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) A person that is an authorized delegate of a licensee under the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act acting within the scope of authority
-19-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
conferred by a written contract with the licensee; or
(b) A person that is exempt pursuant to section 8-2703 and does not
engage in money transmission outside the scope of such exemption.
(3) A license issued under section 8-2713 is not transferable or
assignable.
Director means the Director of Banking and Finance.
Sec. 11. Section 8-2710, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2710 (1) To establish consistent licensing between Nebraska and
other states, the director is authorized to:
(a) Implement all licensing provisions of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act in a manner that is consistent with other states that
have adopted a version of the Model Money Transmission Modernization Act
or multistate licensing processes; and
(b) Participate in nationwide protocols for licensing cooperation
and coordination among state regulators provided that such protocols are
consistent with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) In order to fulfill the purposes of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act, the director is authorized to establish relationships
or contracts with the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry
or other entities designated by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry to enable the director to:
(a) Collect and maintain records;
(b) Coordinate multistate licensing processes and supervision
processes;
(c) Process fees; and
(d) Facilitate communication between Nebraska and licensees or other
persons subject to the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(3) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry for all aspects of licensing in accordance
with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, including, but not limited to,
-20-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
license applications, applications for acquisitions of control, surety
bonds, reporting, criminal history background checks, credit checks, fee
processing, and examinations.
(4) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry forms, processes, and functionalities in
accordance with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act. In the event the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry does not provide
functionality, forms, or processes for a provision of the act, the
director is authorized to implement the requirements in a manner that
facilitates uniformity with respect to licensing, supervision, reporting,
and regulation of licensees which are licensed in multiple jurisdictions.
(5) The director is authorized to adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations, or issue an order, to establish requirements for
participation by applicants and licensees in the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry upon the department's determination that
each requirement is consistent with law, public interest, and the
purposes of this section.
Electronic instrument means a card or other tangible object for the
transmission or payment of money that contains a microprocessor chip,
magnetic strip, or other means for the storage of information, that is
prefunded, and the value of which is decremented upon each use.
Electronic instrument does not include a card or other tangible object
that is redeemable by the issuer or its affiliates in goods or services
of the issuer or its affiliates.
Sec. 12. Section 8-2711, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2711 (1) Applicants for a license shall apply in a form and in a
medium as prescribed by the director. Each such form shall contain
content as set forth by rule, regulation, instruction, or procedure of
the director and may be changed or updated by the director in accordance
with applicable law in order to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska
-21-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
Money Transmitters Act and maintain consistency with Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry licensing standards and practices. The
application shall state or contain, as applicable:
(a) The legal name and residential and business addresses of the
applicant and any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in
conducting the applicant's business;
(b) A list of any criminal conviction of the applicant and any
material litigation in which the applicant has been involved in the ten-
year period next preceding the submission of the application;
(c) A description of any money transmission previously provided by
the applicant and the money transmission that the applicant seeks to
provide in this state;
(d) A list of the applicant's proposed authorized delegates and the
locations in this state where the applicant and its authorized delegates
propose to engage in money transmission;
(e) A list of other states in which the applicant is licensed to
engage in money transmission and any license revocation, suspension, or
other disciplinary action taken against the applicant in another state;
(f) Information concerning any bankruptcy or receivership proceeding
affecting the applicant or a person in control of an applicant;
(g) A sample form of contract for authorized delegates, if
applicable;
(h) A sample form of payment instrument or stored value, as
applicable;
(i) The name and address of any federally insured depository
financial institution through which the applicant plans to conduct money
transmission; and
(j) Any other information the Director or the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry reasonably requires with respect to the
applicant.
(2) If an applicant is a corporation, limited liability company,
-22-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
partnership, or other legal entity, the applicant shall also provide:
(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation or formation and state
or country of incorporation or formation;
(b) If applicable, a certificate of good standing from the state or
country in which the applicant was incorporated or formed;
(c) A brief description of the structure or organization of the
applicant, including any parents or subsidiaries of the applicant, and
whether any such parents or subsidiaries are publicly traded;
(d) The legal name, any fictitious or trade name, all business and
residential addresses, and the employment, as applicable, of each key
individual and person in control of the applicant in the ten-year period
preceding the submission of the application;
(e) A list of any criminal convictions and material litigation for a
person in control of the applicant that is not an individual that has
been involved with the applicant in the ten-year period preceding the
submission of the application;
(f) A copy of audited financial statements of the applicant for the
most recent fiscal year and for the two-year period preceding the
submission of the application or, if determined to be acceptable to the
director, certified unaudited financial statements for the most recent
fiscal year or any other period acceptable to the director;
(g) A certified copy of unaudited financial statements of the
applicant for the most recent fiscal quarter;
(h) If the applicant is a publicly traded corporation, a copy of the
most recent report filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission
pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934;
(i) If the applicant is a wholly owned subsidiary of:
(i) A corporation publicly traded in the United States, a copy of
audited financial statements for the parent corporation for the most
recent fiscal year or a copy of the parent corporation's most recent
report filed pursuant to the Securities Exchange Act of 1934; or
-23-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(ii) A corporation publicly traded outside the United States, a copy
of similar documentation filed with the regulator of the parent
corporation's domicile outside the United States;
(j) The name and address of the applicant's registered agent in this
state; and
(k) Any other information the director reasonably requires with
respect to the applicant.
(3) A nonrefundable application fee of one thousand five hundred
dollars must accompany an application for a license under this section.
(4) Other than the nonrefundable application fee, the director may
waive one or more requirements of this section or permit an applicant to
submit other information in lieu of the required information.
Executive officer means the president, chairperson of the executive
committee, senior officer responsible for business decisions, chief
financial officer, and any other person who performs similar functions
for a licensee.
Sec. 13. Section 8-2712, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2712 (1) Any individual in control of a licensee or applicant, any
individual that seeks to acquire control of a licensee, and any key
individual shall furnish to the director, through the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry, the following items:
(a) The individual's fingerprints for submission to the Federal
Bureau of Investigation and the director for purposes of a national
criminal history background check unless the individual currently resides
outside of the United States and has resided outside of the United States
for the last ten years; and
(b) The individual's personal history and experience in a form and
in a medium prescribed by the director, including the following:
(i) An independent credit report from a consumer reporting agency
unless the individual does not have a social security number, in which
-24-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
case, this requirement shall be waived;
(ii) Information related to any criminal conviction or pending
charges; and
(iii) Information related to any regulatory or administrative action
and any civil litigation involving any claim of fraud, misrepresentation,
conversion, mismanagement of funds, breach of fiduciary duty, or breach
of contract.
(2) If the individual has resided outside of the United States at
any time in the last ten years, the individual shall also provide an
investigative background report prepared by an independent search firm
that meets the following requirements:
(a) The firm shall, at a minimum:
(i) Demonstrate that the firm has sufficient knowledge and resources
and employs accepted and reasonable methodologies to conduct the research
of the background report; and
(ii) Not be affiliated with, or have an interest with, the
individual it is researching; and
(b) The investigative background report shall be written in the
English language and shall contain the following, at a minimum:
(i) If available in the individual's current jurisdiction of
residency, a comprehensive credit report, or any equivalent information
obtained or generated by the independent search firm to accomplish such
report, including a search of the court data in the countries, provinces,
states, cities, towns, and areas where the individual resided and worked;
(ii) Criminal record information of the individual for the past ten
years, including, but not limited to, felonies, misdemeanors, or similar
convictions for violations of law in the countries, provinces, states,
cities, towns, and areas where the individual resided and worked;
(iii) Employment history of the individual;
(iv) Media history of the individual, including an electronic search
of national and local publications, wire services, and business
-25-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
applications; and
(v) Financial services-related regulatory history of the individual,
including, but not limited to, money transmission, securities, banking,
insurance, and mortgage-related industries.
(3) The director may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and
distributing information to the United States Department of Justice or
any other governmental agency in order to reduce the points of contact
which the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for
purposes of this section.
Key shareholder means any person or group of persons acting in
concert owning ten percent or more of any voting class of an applicant's
stock.
Sec. 14. Section 8-2713, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2713 (1) When the director determines an application for an
original license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act appears to
include all the items and addresses all of the matters that are required,
the application is complete. The director shall promptly notify the
applicant in a record of the date on which the application is determined
to be complete. The director shall approve, conditionally approve, or
deny the application within one hundred twenty days after the completion
date. The director may for good cause extend such one-hundred-twenty-day
period.
(2) A determination by the director that an application is complete
and is accepted for processing means only that the application, on its
face, appears to include all of the items, including the criminal history
background check response from the Federal Bureau of Investigation, and
address all of the matters that are required, and is not an assessment of
the substance of the application or of the sufficiency of the information
provided.
-26-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(3) When an application is filed and considered complete under this
section, the director shall investigate the applicant's financial
condition, financial responsibility, financial and business experience,
character, and general fitness. The director may conduct an investigation
of the applicant, the reasonable cost of which the applicant must pay.
The director shall issue a license to an applicant under this section if
the director finds that all of the following conditions have been
fulfilled:
(a) The applicant has complied with sections 8-2711 and 8-2712; and
(b) The financial condition, financial responsibility, financial and
business experience, competence, character, and general fitness of the
applicant and the competence, experience, character, and general fitness
of the key individuals and persons in control of the applicant indicate
that it is in the interest of the public to permit the applicant to
engage in money transmission.
(4) The director shall issue a formal written notice of the denial
of a license application within thirty days after the decision to deny
such application. The director shall set forth in the notice of denial
the specific reasons for the denial of the application. An applicant
whose application is denied by the director under this section may appeal
within thirty days after receipt of the written notice of the denial. The
appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(5) If an applicant for a license under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act does not complete the license application and fails to
respond to a notice or notices from the department to correct a
deficiency or deficiencies for a period of one hundred twenty days or
more after the date the department sends the initial notice to correct
the deficiency or deficiencies, the department may deem the application
as abandoned and may issue a notice of abandonment of the application to
the applicant in lieu of proceedings to deny the application.
(6) The initial license term shall begin on the day the application
-27-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
is approved. The license shall expire on December 31 of the year in which
the license term began, unless the initial license date is on or after
November 1 and on or before December 31, in which instance the initial
license term shall run through December 31 of the following year.
Licensee means a person licensed pursuant to the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act.
Sec. 15. Section 8-2714, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2714 (1) A license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act shall
be renewed annually.
(2) An annual renewal fee of seven hundred fifty dollars shall be
paid no more than sixty days before the license expiration.
(3) The renewal term shall be for a period of one year and shall
begin on January 1 of each year after the initial license term and shall
expire on December 31 of the year the renewal term begins.
(4) A licensee shall submit a renewal report with the renewal fee,
in a form and in a medium prescribed by the director. The renewal report
shall state or contain a description of each material change in
information submitted by the licensee in its original license application
which has not been reported to the director.
(5) The director may, for good cause, grant an extension to when the
submission of the renewal fee and report is due for renewal for a
licensee.
(6) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry to process license renewals provided that
such functionality is consistent with this section.
Material litigation means any litigation that, according to
generally accepted accounting principles, is deemed significant to an
applicant's or licensee's financial health and would be required to be
referenced in an applicant's or licensee's annual audited financial
statements, report to shareholders, or similar documents.
-28-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
Sec. 16. Section 8-2715, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2715 (1) If a licensee does not continue to meet the
qualifications or satisfy the requirements that apply to an applicant for
a new money transmission license, the director may suspend or revoke the
licensee's license in accordance with the procedures established by the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or other applicable state law for such
suspension or revocation.
(2) An applicant shall demonstrate that the applicant meets or will
meet, and a licensee shall at all times meet, the requirements of
sections 8-2730, 8-2731, and 8-2732.
Monetary value means a medium of exchange, whether or not redeemable
in money.
Sec. 17. Section 8-2716, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2716 (1) Any person, or group of persons acting in concert,
seeking to acquire control of a licensee shall obtain the written
approval of the director prior to acquiring control. An individual is not
deemed to acquire control of a licensee and is not subject to this
section when that individual becomes a key individual for a licensee in
the ordinary course of business.
(2) A person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to
acquire control of a licensee shall, in cooperation with the licensee:
(a) Submit an application in a form and in a medium prescribed by
the director; and
(b) Submit a nonrefundable fee of one thousand five hundred dollars
with the request for approval.
(3) Upon request, the director may permit a licensee or the person,
or group of persons acting in concert, to submit some or all information
required by the director pursuant to this section without using the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.
-29-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(4) The application required by this section shall include the
information required by section 8-2712 for any new key individuals that
have not previously completed the requirements of section 8-2712 for a
licensee.
(5) When the director determines an application for acquisition of
control under this section appears to include all the items and address
all of the matters that are required, the application shall be considered
complete and the director shall promptly notify the applicant in writing
of the date on which the application was determined to be complete.
(6) The director shall approve or deny the application within sixty
days after the completion date and, if the application is not approved or
denied by the director within sixty days after the completion date, the
application is deemed approved and the person, or group of persons acting
in concert, are not prohibited from acquiring control of the licensee.
The director may for good cause extend such sixty-day period.
(7) A determination by the director that an application is complete
and is accepted for processing means only that the application, on its
face, appears to include all of the items and address all of the matters
that are required, and is not an assessment of the substance of the
application or of the sufficiency of the information provided.
(8) When an application is filed and considered complete under this
section, the director shall investigate the financial condition,
financial responsibility, financial and business experience, character,
and general fitness of the person, or group of persons acting in concert,
seeking to acquire control. The director shall approve an acquisition of
control pursuant to this section if the director finds that all of the
following conditions have been fulfilled:
(a) The requirements of subsections (1) and (2) of this section have
been met, as applicable; and
(b) The financial condition, financial responsibility, financial and
business experience, competence, character, and general fitness of the
-30-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
person, or group of persons acting in concert, seeking to acquire control
and the competence, experience, character, and general fitness of the key
individuals and persons that would be in control of the licensee after
the acquisition of control indicate that it is in the interest of the
public to permit the person, or group of persons acting in concert, to
control the licensee.
(9) The director shall issue a formal written notice of the denial
of an application to acquire control within thirty days after the
decision to deny the application. The director shall set forth in the
notice of denial the specific reasons for the denial of the application.
An applicant whose application is denied by the director under this
section may appeal within thirty days after receipt of the written notice
of the denial. The appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(10) The requirements of this section do not apply to any of the
following:
(a) A person that acts as a proxy for the sole purpose of voting at
a designated meeting of the shareholders or holders of voting shares or
voting interests of a licensee or a person in control of a licensee;
(b) A person that acquires control of a licensee by devise or
descent;
(c) A person that acquires control of a licensee as a personal
representative, custodian, guardian, conservator, or trustee, or as an
officer appointed by a court of competent jurisdiction or by operation of
law;
(d) A person that is exempt under subdivision (7) of section 8-2703;
(e) A person that the director determines is not subject to this
section based on the public interest;
(f) A public offering of securities of a licensee or a person in
control of a licensee; or
(g) An internal reorganization of a person in control of the
-31-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
licensee where the ultimate person in control of the licensee remains the
same.
(11) Persons described in subdivisions (11)(a), (b), (c), (d), (f),
and (g) of this section, in cooperation with the licensee, shall notify
the director within fifteen days after the acquisition of control.
(12) Before filing an application for approval to acquire control of
a licensee, a person may request in writing a determination from the
director as to whether the person would be considered a person in control
of a licensee upon consummation of a proposed transaction. If the
director determines that the person would not be a person in control of a
licensee, the proposed person and transaction is not subject to the
requirements of this section.
Money transmission means the business of the sale or issuance of
payment instruments or stored value or of receiving money or monetary
value for transmission to a location within or outside the United States
by any and all means, including wire, facsimile, or electronic transfer.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, money transmission also
includes bill payment services not limited to the right to receive
payment of any claim for another but does not include bill payment
services in which an agent of a payee receives money or monetary value on
behalf of such payee.
Sec. 18. Section 8-2717, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2717 (1) A licensee adding or replacing any key individual shall:
(a) Provide notice in a manner prescribed by the director within
fifteen days after the date the key individual's appointment became
effective; and
(b) Provide the information required by section 8-2712 within forty-
five days of the date after the key individual's appointment.
(2) Within ninety days after the date on which the notice provided
pursuant to this section was determined to be complete, the director may
-32-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
issue a notice of disapproval of an added or replacement key individual
if the director determines that, given the competence, experience,
character, or integrity of the individual, permitting the individual to
be a key individual of such licensee would not be in the best interest of
the public or the customers of the licensee.
(3) A notice of disapproval shall contain a statement of the basis
for disapproval and shall be sent to the licensee and the disapproved
individual. A licensee may appeal a notice of disapproval within thirty
days after receipt of such notice of disapproval. The appeal shall be in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) If the notice provided pursuant to this section is not
disapproved within ninety days after the date on which the notice was
determined to be complete, the key individual is deemed approved.
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry means a licensing
system developed and maintained by the Conference of State Bank
Supervisors and the American Association of Residential Mortgage
Regulators for the licensing and registration of mortgage loan
originators, mortgage bankers, installment loan companies, and other
state-regulated financial services entities and industries.
Sec. 19. Section 8-2718, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2718 (1) Each licensee shall submit a report of condition within
forty-five days after the end of a calendar quarter, or within any
extended time as the director may prescribe.
(2) The report of condition shall include:
(a) Financial information at the licensee level;
(b) Nationwide and state-specific money transmission transaction
information in every jurisdiction in the United States where the licensee
is licensed to engage in money transmission;
(c) A permissible investments report of the licensee;
(d) Transaction destination country reporting for money received for
-33-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
transmission, if applicable; and
(e) Any other information the director reasonably requires with
respect to the licensee.
(3) The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry for the submission of the report required
by this section and is authorized to update as necessary the requirements
of this section to carry out the purposes of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act and maintain consistency with Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry reporting.
(4) The information required by subdivision (2)(d) of this section
shall only be included in a report of condition submitted within forty-
five days after the end of the fourth calendar quarter.
Outstanding payment instrument means any payment instrument issued
by a licensee which has been sold in the United States directly by the
licensee or any payment instrument issued by a licensee which has been
sold by an authorized delegate of the licensee in the United States,
which has been reported to the licensee as having been sold, and which
has not yet been paid by or for the licensee.
Sec. 20. Section 8-2719, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2719 (1) Each licensee shall, within ninety days after the end of
each fiscal year or within any time period after the end of the fiscal
year as the director may prescribe, file with the director:
(a) An audited financial statement of the licensee for the fiscal
year prepared in accordance with United States generally accepted
accounting principles; and
(b) Any other information as the director may reasonably require.
(2) Such audited financial statement shall be prepared by an
independent certified public accountant or independent public accountant
who is satisfactory to the director.
(3) Such audited financial statement shall include or be accompanied
-34-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
by a certificate of opinion of the independent certified public
accountant or independent public accountant that is satisfactory in form
and content to the director. If the certificate or opinion is qualified,
the director may order the licensee to take any action as the director
may find necessary to enable the independent certified public accountant
or independent public accountant to remove the qualification.
Payment instrument means any electronic or written check, draft,
money order, travelers check, or other electronic or written instrument
or order for the transmission or payment of money, sold or issued to one
or more persons, whether or not such instrument is negotiable. Payment
instrument does not include any credit card, any voucher, any letter of
credit, or any instrument that is redeemable by the issuer or its
affiliates in goods or services of the issuer or its affiliates.
Sec. 21. Section 8-2720, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2720 (1) Each licensee shall submit a report of authorized
delegates within forty-five days after the end of each calendar quarter.
The director is authorized to utilize the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry for the submission of the report required by this
section provided that such functionality is consistent with the
requirements of this section.
(2) The authorized delegate report shall include, at a minimum, each
authorized delegate's:
(a) Company legal name;
(b) Taxpayer employer identification number;
(c) Principal provider identifier;
(d) Physical address;
(e) Mailing address;
(f) Business conducted in other states;
(g) Fictitious or trade names;
(h) Contact person name, telephone number, and email;
-35-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(i) Start date as the licensee's authorized delegate;
(j) End date acting as the licensee's authorized delegate, if
applicable; and
(k) Any other information the director reasonably requires with
respect to the authorized delegate.
Permissible investments means:
(1) Cash;
(2) Certificates of deposit or other debt obligations of a financial
institution, either domestic or foreign;
(3) Bills of exchange or time drafts drawn on and accepted by a
commercial bank, otherwise known as bankers' acceptances, which are
eligible for purchase by member banks of the federal reserve system;
(4) Any investment bearing a rating of one of the three highest
grades as defined by a nationally recognized organization that rates such
securities;
(5) Investment securities that are obligations of the United States
or its agencies or instrumentalities, obligations that are guaranteed
fully as to principal and interest by the United States, or any
obligations of any state or political subdivision thereof;
(6) Shares in a money market mutual fund, interest-bearing bills or
notes or bonds, debentures or stock traded on any national securities
exchange or on a national over-the-counter market, or mutual funds
primarily composed of such securities or a fund composed of one of more
permissible investments as set forth in this section;
(7) Any demand borrowing agreement or agreements made to a
corporation or a subsidiary of a corporation whose capital stock is
listed on a national exchange;
(8) Receivables that are due to a licensee from its authorized
delegates pursuant to a contract described in section 8-2739 which are
not past due or doubtful of collection; or
(9) Any other investment or similar security approved by the
-36-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
director.
Sec. 22. Section 8-2721, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2721 (1) A licensee shall file a report with the director within
one business day after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence
of any of the following events:
(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the
United States Bankruptcy Code for bankruptcy or reorganization;
(b) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for
receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or administrative
proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or the making of a
general assignment for the benefit of its creditors; or
(c) The commencement of a proceeding to revoke or suspend the
license of a licensee in a state or country in which the licensee engages
in business or is licensed.
(2) A licensee shall file a report with the director within three
business days after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of
any of the following events:
(a) A charge or conviction of the licensee or of a key individual or
person in control of the licensee for a felony; or
(b) A charge or conviction of an authorized delegate for a felony.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this
subsection, a licensee shall notify the director in writing or through
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry within three
business days after the time that the licensee becomes aware of any
breach of security of the system of computerized data owned or licensed
by the licensee, which contains personal information about a Nebraska
resident, or the unauthorized access to or use of such information about
a Nebraska resident as a result of the breach. For purposes of this
subsection, the terms breach of the security of the system and personal
information have the same meaning as in section 87-802.
-37-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(b) If a licensee would be required under Nebraska law to provide
notification to a Nebraska resident regarding such breach, then the
licensee shall provide a copy of such notification to the department
prior to or simultaneously with the licensee's notification to the
Nebraska resident.
(c) Notice required by this subsection may be delayed if a law
enforcement agency determines that the notice will impede a criminal
investigation. Notice shall be made in good faith and without
unreasonable delay as soon as possible after the law enforcement agency
determines that notification will no longer impede the investigation.
Person means any individual, partnership, limited liability company,
association, joint-stock association, trust, or corporation. Person does
not include the United States or the State of Nebraska.
Sec. 23. Section 8-2722, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2722 A licensee and an authorized delegate shall file all reports
required by the federal currency reporting, record-keeping, and
suspicious activity reporting requirements set forth in the Bank Secrecy
Act and other federal and state laws pertaining to money laundering. The
timely filing of a complete and accurate report required under this
section with the appropriate federal agency is deemed to be in compliance
with the requirements of this section. Remit, except as used in section
8-2747, means either to make direct payment of the funds to a licensee or
its representatives authorized to receive those funds or to deposit the
funds in a bank, credit union, or savings and loan association or other
similar financial institution in an account specified by a licensee.
Sec. 24. Section 8-2723, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2723 (1) A licensee shall maintain the following records, for
determining the licensee's compliance with the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act, for at least five years:
-38-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(a) A record of each outstanding money transmission obligation sold;
(b) A general ledger posted at least monthly containing all asset,
liability, capital, income, and expense accounts;
(c) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;
(d) Records of outstanding money transmission obligations;
(e) Records of each outstanding money transmission obligation paid;
(f) A list of the last-known names and addresses of all of the
licensee's authorized delegates; and
(g) Any other records the director reasonably requires by rule or
regulation.
(2) The items specified in subsection (1) of this section may be
maintained in any form of record.
(3) Records specified in subsection (1) of this section may be
maintained outside this state if they are made accessible to the director
within seven business days after notice.
(4) All records maintained by the licensee as required in subsection
(1) of this section are subject to inspection by the director pursuant to
section 8-2707.
Stored value means monetary value that is evidenced by an electronic
record. Stored value does not include any item that is redeemable by the
issuer or its affiliates in goods or services of the issuer or its
affiliates.
Sec. 25. Section 8-2724, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
8-2724 (1) Before a licensee is authorized to conduct business
through an authorized delegate or allows a person to act as the
licensee's authorized delegate, the licensee shall:
(a) Adopt, and update as necessary, written policies and procedures
reasonably designed to ensure that the licensee's authorized delegates
comply with applicable state and federal law;
(b) Enter into a written contract that complies with subsection (3)
-39-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
of this section; and
(c) Conduct a reasonable risk-based background investigation
sufficient for the licensee to determine whether the authorized delegate
has complied and will likely comply with applicable state and federal
law.
(2) An authorized delegate shall operate in full compliance with the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(3) The written contract required by subdivision (1)(b) of this
section shall be signed by the licensee and the authorized delegate and,
at a minimum, also shall:
(a) Appoint the person signing the contract as the licensee's
authorized delegate with the authority to conduct money transmission on
behalf of the licensee;
(b) Set forth the nature and scope of the relationship between the
licensee and the authorized delegate and the respective rights and
responsibilities of the parties;
(c) Require the authorized delegate to agree to fully comply with
all applicable state and federal laws, rules, and regulations pertaining
to money transmission, including the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act and
the rules and regulations implementing the act, the Bank Secrecy Act and
the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools
Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001;
(d) Require the authorized delegate to remit and handle money and
monetary value in accordance with the terms of the contract between the
licensee and the authorized delegate;
(e) Impose a trust on money and monetary value net of fees received
for money transmission for the benefit of the licensee;
(f) Require the authorized delegate to prepare and maintain records
as required by the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or the rules and
regulations implementing the act, or as reasonably requested by the
director;
-40-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(g) Acknowledge that the authorized delegate consents to examination
or investigation by the director;
(h) State that the licensee is subject to regulation by the director
and that, as part of that regulation, the director may suspend or revoke
an authorized delegate designation or require the licensee to terminate
an authorized delegate designation; and
(i) Acknowledge receipt of the written policies and procedures
required under subdivision (1)(a) of this section.
(4) If the licensee's license is suspended, revoked, canceled,
surrendered, or expired, the licensee shall, within five business days,
provide documentation to the director that the licensee has notified all
applicable authorized delegates of the licensee whose names are in a
record filed with the director of the suspension, revocation,
cancellation, surrender, or expiration of the license. Upon suspension,
revocation, cancellation, surrender, or expiration of the license,
applicable authorized delegates shall immediately cease to provide money
transmission as an authorized delegate of the licensee.
(5) An authorized delegate of a licensee holds in trust for the
benefit of the licensee all money net of fees received from money
transmission. If any authorized delegate commingles any funds received
from money transmission with any other funds or property owned or
controlled by the authorized delegate, all commingled funds and other
property shall be considered held in trust in favor of the licensee in an
amount equal to the amount of money net of fees received from money
transmission by the authorized delegate on behalf of the licensee.
(6) An authorized delegate may not use a subdelegate to conduct
money transmission on behalf of a licensee.
(1) The requirement for a license under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act does not apply to:
(a) The United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof;
-41-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(b) Any post office of the United States Postal Service;
(c) A state or any political subdivision thereof;
(d)(i) Banks, credit unions, digital asset depository institutions
as defined in section 8-3003, building and loan associations, savings and
loan associations, savings banks, or mutual banks organized under the
laws of any state or the United States;
(ii) Subsidiaries of the institutions listed in subdivision (d)(i)
of this subsection;
(iii) Bank holding companies which have a banking subsidiary located
in Nebraska and whose debt securities have an investment grade rating by
a national rating agency; or
(iv) Authorized delegates of the institutions and entities listed in
subdivision (d)(i), (ii), or (iii) of this subsection, except that
authorized delegates that are not banks, credit unions, building and loan
associations, savings and loan associations, savings banks, mutual banks,
subsidiaries of any of the foregoing, or bank holding companies shall
comply with all requirements imposed upon authorized delegates under the
act;
(e) The provision of electronic transfer of government benefits for
any federal, state, or county governmental agency, as defined in Consumer
Financial Protection Bureau Regulation E, 12 C.F.R. part 1005, as such
regulation existed on January 1, 2024, by a contractor for and on behalf
of the United States or any department, agency, or instrumentality
thereof or any state or any political subdivision thereof;
(f) An operator of a payment system only to the extent that the
payment system provides processing, clearing, or settlement services
between or among persons who are all exempt under this section in
connection with wire transfers, credit card transactions, debit card
transactions, automated clearinghouse transfers, or similar fund
transfers; or
(g) A person, firm, corporation, or association licensed in this
-42-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
state and acting within this state within the scope of a license:
(i) As a collection agency pursuant to the Collection Agency Act;
(ii) As a credit services organization pursuant to the Credit
Services Organization Act; or
(iii) To engage in the debt management business pursuant to sections
69-1201 to 69-1217.
(2) An authorized delegate of a licensee or of an exempt entity,
acting within the scope of its authority conferred by a written contract
as described in section 8-2739, is not required to obtain a license under
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, except that such an authorized
delegate shall comply with the other provisions of the act which apply to
money transmission transactions.
Sec. 26. Section 8-2725, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2725 A person shall not engage in the business of money
transmission on behalf of a person not licensed under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act or not exempt from the act pursuant to section 8-2703. A
person that engages in such business and provides money transmission to
the same extent as if the unlicensed or nonexempt person were a licensee
shall be jointly and severally liable with the unlicensed or nonexempt
person. (1) Except as otherwise provided in section 8-2724, a person
shall not engage in money transmission without a license issued pursuant
to the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) A person is engaged in money transmission if the person provides
money transmission services to any resident of this state even if the
person providing money transmission services has no physical presence in
this state or if the resident is not physically located in this state at
the time when the resident enters into money transmission or otherwise
receives money transmission services.
(3) If a licensee has a physical presence in this state, the
licensee may conduct its business at one or more locations, directly or
-43-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
indirectly owned, or through one or more authorized delegates, or both,
pursuant to the single license granted to the licensee.
(4) A license issued pursuant to the act is not transferable or
assignable.
Sec. 27. Section 8-2726, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2726 (1) Every licensee shall forward all money received for
transmission in accordance with the terms of the agreement between the
licensee and the sender unless the licensee has a reasonable belief or a
reasonable basis to believe that the sender may be a victim of fraud or
that a crime or violation of any law, rule, or regulation has occurred,
is occurring, or may occur.
(2) If a licensee does not forward money received for transmission
in accordance with this section, the licensee shall respond to inquiries
by the sender with the reason for not forwarding the money unless
providing a response would violate a state or federal law, rule, or
regulation.
To qualify for a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act,
an applicant, at the time of filing for a license, and a licensee at all
times after a license is issued, shall satisfy the following
requirements:
(1) Each applicant or licensee must have a net worth of not less
than fifty thousand dollars, calculated in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles;
(2) The financial condition and responsibility, financial and
business experience, and character and general fitness of the applicant
or licensee must reasonably warrant the belief that the applicant's or
licensee's business will be conducted honestly, fairly, and in a manner
commanding the confidence and trust of the community. In determining
whether this requirement is met and for purposes of investigating
compliance with the act, the director may review and consider the
-44-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
relevant business records and capital adequacy of the applicant or
licensee;
(3) Each corporate applicant or licensee must be organized under the
laws of any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, any
territory of the United States, Puerto Rico, Guam, American Samoa, the
Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands, the Virgin Islands, or the
Northern Mariana Islands, and must be in good standing in the place of
its incorporation;
(4) Each applicant or licensee must be registered or qualified to do
business in the State of Nebraska; and
(5) Each applicant or licensee must maintain an office in the United
States.
Sec. 28. Section 8-2727, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2727 (1) This section does not apply to:
(a) Money received for transmission subject to the federal
remittance rule; or
(b) Money received for transmission pursuant to a written agreement
between the licensee and payee to process payments for goods or services
provided by the payee.
(2) Every licensee shall refund to the sender within ten days after
receipt of the sender's written request for a refund of any and all money
received for transmission unless any of the following occurs:
(a) The money has been forwarded within ten days after the date on
which the money was received for transmission;
(b) Instructions have been given committing an equivalent amount of
money to the person designated by the sender within ten days after the
date on which the money was received for transmission;
(c) The agreement between the licensee and the sender instructs the
licensee to forward the money at a time that is beyond ten days after the
date on which the money was received for transmission. If funds have not
-45-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
yet been forwarded in accordance with the terms of the agreement between
the licensee and the sender, the licensee shall issue a refund in
accordance with the other provisions of this section;
(d) The refund is requested for a transaction that the licensee has
not completed based on a reasonable belief or a reasonable basis to
believe that a crime or violation of law, rule, or regulation has
occurred, is occurring, or may occur; or
(e) The refund request does not enable the licensee to:
(i) Identify the sender's name and address or telephone number; or
(ii) Identify the particular transaction to be refunded in the event
the sender has multiple transactions outstanding.
(1)(a) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, an
applicant shall submit, with the application, a surety bond issued by a
bonding company or insurance company authorized to do business in this
state and acceptable to the director in the principal sum of one hundred
thousand dollars. The director may increase the amount of the bond to a
maximum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars for good cause.
(b) The bond shall be in a form satisfactory to the director and
shall run to the state for the benefit of any claimants against the
licensee to secure the faithful performance of the obligations of the
licensee with respect to the receipt, handling, transmission, and payment
of money in connection with money transmission. In the case of a bond,
the aggregate liability of the surety shall not exceed the principal sum
of the bond. Any claimant against the licensee may bring suit directly on
the bond or the director may bring suit on behalf of any claimant, either
in one action or in successive actions.
(2) Upon filing of the report required by section 8-2734 and the
information required by subdivision (2)(b) of such section, a licensee
shall maintain or increase its surety bond to reflect the total dollar
amount of money transmitter transactions by the licensee in this state in
the most recent four calendar quarters for which data is available before
-46-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
the date of the filing of the renewal application in accordance with the
following table. A licensee may decrease its surety bond in accordance
with the following table if the surety bond required is less than the
amount of the surety bond on file with the department:
Dollar Amount of Money Transmitter Transactions Surety Bond Required
$0.00 to $2,000,000.00 $100,000.00
$2,000,000.01 to $4,000,000.00 $150,000.00
$4,000,000.01 to $6,000,000.00 $200,000.00
Over $6,000,000.00 $250,000.00
(3) If the department determines that a licensee does not maintain a
surety bond in the amount required by subsection (2) of this section, the
department shall give written notification to the licensee requiring it
to increase the surety bond within thirty days to the amount required by
such subsection.
(4) The director may at any time require the filing of a new or
supplemental bond in the form as provided in subsection (1) of this
section if he or she determines that the bond filed under this section is
exhausted or is inadequate for any reason, including, but not limited to,
the financial condition of a licensee or an applicant for a license or
violations of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, any rule and
regulation or order thereunder, or any state or federal law applicable to
a licensee or an applicant for a license. The new or supplemental bond
shall not exceed five hundred thousand dollars.
(5)(a) In lieu of the corporate surety bond or bonds required by
this section or of any portion of the principal thereof, the applicant or
licensee may deposit, with the director or with such banks or trust
companies located in this state or with any federal reserve bank as the
applicant or licensee may designate and the director may approve,
interest-bearing stocks and bonds, notes, debentures or other obligations
of the United States or any agency or instrumentality thereof, or
guaranteed by the United States, or of this state, or of a city, county,
-47-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
village, school district, or instrumentality of this state, or guaranteed
by this state, to an aggregate amount, based upon principal amount or
market value, whichever is lower, of not less than the amount of the
required corporate surety bond or portion thereof. The securities shall
be deposited and held to secure the same obligations as would the surety
bond.
(b) The licensee shall have the right, with the approval of the
director, to substitute other securities for those deposited and shall be
required to do so on written order of the director made for good cause
shown. The licensee shall pay the fees prescribed in section 8-602 for
pledging and substitution of securities. So long as the licensee so
depositing shall continue solvent and is not in violation of the Nebraska
Money Transmitters Act, such licensee shall be permitted to receive the
interest or dividends on such deposit.
(c) The safekeeping of such securities and all other expenses
incidental to the pledging of such securities shall be paid by the
licensee. All such securities shall be subject to sale and transfer and
to the disposal of the proceeds by the director only on the order of a
court of competent jurisdiction.
(6) The surety bond shall remain in effect until cancellation, which
may occur only after thirty days' written notice to the director.
Cancellation shall not affect any liability incurred or accrued during
the period the surety bond was in effect.
(7) The surety bond shall remain in place for at least five years
after the licensee ceases money transmission in this state, except that
the director may permit the surety bond to be reduced or eliminated
before that time to the extent that the amount of the licensee's payment
instruments outstanding in this state are reduced. The director may also
permit a licensee to substitute a letter of credit or such other form of
security acceptable to the director for the surety bond in place at the
time the licensee ceases money transmission in the state.
-48-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
Sec. 29. Section 8-2728, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2728 (1) This section does not apply to:
(a) Money received for transmission subject to the federal
remittance rule; or
(b) Money received for transmission that is not primarily for
personal, family, or household purposes;
(c) Money received for transmission pursuant to a written agreement
between the licensee and payee to process payments for goods or services
provided by the payee; or
(d) Payroll processing services.
(2)(a) Every licensee or authorized delegate shall provide the
sender a receipt for money received for transmission.
(b) The receipt shall contain the following information, as
applicable:
(i) The name of the sender;
(ii) The name of the designated recipient;
(iii) The date of the transaction;
(iv) The unique transaction or identification number;
(v) The name of the licensee, Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry unique identification, the licensee's business address, and
the licensee's customer service telephone number;
(vi) The name and telephone number of the department and a statement
that the licensee's customers can contact the department with questions
or complaints about the licensee's money transmission services;
(vii) The amount of the transaction in United States dollars;
(viii) Any fee charged by the licensee to the sender for the
transaction; and
(ix) Any tax collected by the licensee from the sender for the
transaction.
(c) For a transaction conducted in person, the receipt may be
-49-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
provided electronically if the sender requests or agrees to receive an
electronic receipt. For a transaction conducted electronically or by
telephone, a receipt may be provided electronically. All electronic
receipts shall be provided in a retainable form.
(d) The receipt required by this subsection shall be in English and
in the language principally used by the licensee or authorized delegate
to advertise, solicit, or negotiate, either orally or in writing, for a
transaction conducted in person, electronically, or by telephone, if
other than English.
(1) Each licensee shall at all times possess permissible investments
having an aggregate market value, calculated in accordance with generally
accepted accounting principles, of not less than the aggregate face
amount of all outstanding payment instruments and stored value issued or
sold by the licensee in the United States. This requirement may be waived
by the director if the dollar volume of a licensee's outstanding payment
instruments and stored value does not exceed the bond or other security
posted by the licensee pursuant to section 8-2727.
(2) Permissible investments, even if commingled with other assets of
the licensee, are deemed by operation of law to be held in trust for the
benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's outstanding
payment instruments in the event of the bankruptcy of the licensee.
Sec. 30. Section 8-2729, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
8-2729 (1) A licensee that provides payroll processing services
shall:
(a) Issue reports to clients detailing client payroll obligations in
advance of the payroll funds being deducted from an account; and
(b) Make available employee paystubs or an equivalent statement to
employees.
(2) This section does not apply to a licensee providing payroll
processing services where the licensee's client designates the intended
-50-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
recipients to the licensee and is responsible for providing the
disclosures required by subdivision (1)(b) of this section.
Each application for a license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act shall be made in writing and in a form prescribed by the director.
Each application shall state or contain:
(1) For all applicants:
(a) The exact name of the applicant, the applicant's principal
address, any fictitious or trade name used by the applicant in the
conduct of its business, and the location of the applicant's business
records;
(b) The history of the applicant's criminal convictions and material
litigation for the five-year period before the date of the application;
(c) A description of the activities conducted by the applicant and a
history of operations;
(d) A description of the business activities in which the applicant
seeks to be engaged in this state;
(e) A list identifying the applicant's proposed authorized delegates
in this state, if any, at the time of the filing of the application;
(f) A sample authorized delegate contract, if applicable;
(g) A sample form of payment instrument, if applicable;
(h) The locations at which the applicant and its authorized
delegates, if any, propose to conduct money transmission in this state;
and
(i) The name, address, and account information of each clearing bank
or banks, which shall be covered by federal deposit insurance, on which
the applicant's payment instruments and funds received for transmission
or otherwise will be drawn or through which the payment instruments or
other funds will be payable;
(2) If the applicant is a corporation, the applicant shall also
provide:
(a) The date of the applicant's incorporation and state of
-51-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
incorporation;
(b) A certificate of good standing from the state in which the
applicant was incorporated;
(c) A certificate of authority from the Secretary of State to
conduct business in this state;
(d) A description of the corporate structure of the applicant,
including the identity of any parent or subsidiary of the applicant, and
a disclosure of whether any parent or subsidiary is publicly traded on
any stock exchange;
(e) The name, business and residence addresses, and employment
history for the five-year period immediately before the date of the
application of the applicant's executive officers and the officers or
managers who will be in charge of the applicant's activities to be
licensed under the act;
(f) The name, business and residence addresses, and employment
history for the five-year period immediately before the date of the
application and the most recent personal financial statement of any key
shareholder of the applicant;
(g) The history of material litigation for the five-year period
immediately before the date of the application of every executive officer
or key shareholder of the applicant;
(h) Background checks as provided in section 8-2730;
(i) A copy of the applicant's most recent audited financial
statement including balance sheet, statement of income or loss, statement
of changes in shareholder equity, and statement of changes in financial
position and, if available, the applicant's audited financial statements
for the immediately preceding two-year period. However, if the applicant
is a wholly owned subsidiary of another corporation, the applicant may
submit either the parent corporation's consolidated audited financial
statements for the current year and for the immediately preceding two-
year period or the parent corporation's Form 10-K reports filed with the
-52-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
United States Securities and Exchange Commission for the prior three
years in lieu of the applicant's financial statements. If the applicant
is a wholly owned subsidiary of a corporation having its principal place
of business outside the United States, similar documentation filed with
the parent corporation's non-United States regulator may be submitted to
satisfy this subdivision; and
(j) Copies of all filings, if any, made by the applicant with the
United States Securities and Exchange Commission or with a similar
regulator in a country other than the United States, within the year
preceding the date of filing of the application; and
(3) If the applicant is not a corporation, the applicant shall also
provide:
(a) The name, business and residence addresses, personal financial
statement, and employment history, for the five-year period immediately
before the date of the application, of each principal of the applicant
and the name, business and residence addresses, and employment history
for the five-year period immediately before the date of the application
of any other person or persons who will be in charge of the applicant's
money transmission activities;
(b) A copy of the applicant's registration or qualification to do
business in this state;
(c) The history of material litigation for the five-year period
immediately before the date of the application for each individual having
any ownership interest in the applicant and each individual who exercises
supervisory responsibility with respect to the applicant's activities;
(d) Background checks as provided in section 8-2730; and
(e) Copies of the applicant's audited financial statements including
balance sheet, statement of income or loss, and statement of changes in
financial position for the current year and, if available, for the
immediately preceding two-year period.
Sec. 31. Section 8-2730, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
-53-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
2024, is amended to read:
8-2730 (1) A licensee shall maintain at all times a net worth of the
greater of one hundred thousand dollars or three percent of the
licensee's total assets for the first one hundred million dollars, two
percent of additional assets for over one hundred million dollars to one
billion dollars, and one-half percent of additional assets for over one
billion dollars.
(2) Net worth shall be demonstrated at initial application by the
applicant's most recent audited or, if allowed by the director, unaudited
financial statements provided pursuant to subdivision (2)(f) of section
8-2711.
(3) Notwithstanding subsections (1) and (2) of this section, the
director shall have the authority, for good cause shown, to exempt any
applicant or licensee in-part or in whole, from the requirements of
subsections (1) and (2) of this section.
(1) Effective July 1, 2014, the department shall require licensees
under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act to be licensed and registered
through the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. In order
to carry out this requirement, the department is authorized to
participate in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. For
this purpose, the department may establish, by adopting and promulgating
rules and regulations or by order, requirements as necessary. The
requirements may include, but are not limited to:
(a) Background checks of applicants and licensees, including, but
not limited to:
(i) Fingerprints of every executive officer, director, partner,
member, sole proprietor, or shareholder submitted to the Federal Bureau
of Investigation and any other governmental agency or entity authorized
to receive such information for a state, national, and international
criminal history record information check, except that the department
shall not require the submission of fingerprints by (A) an executive
-54-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
officer or director of an applicant or licensee which is either a
publicly traded company or a wholly owned subsidiary of a publicly traded
company or (B) an applicant or licensee who has previously submitted the
fingerprints of an executive officer, director, partner, member, sole
proprietor, or shareholder directly to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry and the Federal Bureau of Investigation will accept
such fingerprints for a criminal background check;
(ii) Checks of civil or administrative records;
(iii) Checks of an applicant's or a licensee's credit history; or
(iv) Any other information as deemed necessary by the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;
(b) The payment of fees to apply for or renew a license through the
Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry;
(c) The setting or resetting, as necessary, of renewal processing or
reporting dates;
(d) Information and reports pertaining to authorized delegates; and
(e) Amending or surrendering a license or any other such activities
as the director deems necessary for participation in the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.
(2) In order to fulfill the purposes of the act, the department is
authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the Nationwide
Mortgage Licensing System and Registry or other entities designated by
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry to collect and
maintain records and process transaction fees or other fees related to
licensees or other persons subject to the act. The department may allow
such system to collect licensing fees on behalf of the department and
allow such system to collect a processing fee for the services of the
system directly from each licensee or applicant for a license.
(3) The director is required to regularly report enforcement actions
and other relevant information to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing
System and Registry subject to the provisions contained in section
-55-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
8-2731.
(4) The director shall establish a process whereby applicants and
licensees may challenge information entered into the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry by the director.
(5) The department shall ensure that the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry adopts a privacy, data security, and breach
of security of the system notification policy. The director shall make
available upon written request a copy of the contract between the
department and the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry
pertaining to the breach of security of the system provisions.
(6) The department shall upon written request provide the most
recently available audited financial report of the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry.
(7) The director may use the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System
and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting information from and
distributing information to the United States Department of Justice or
any other governmental agency in order to reduce the points of contact
which the Federal Bureau of Investigation may have to maintain for
purposes of subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 32. Section 8-2731, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2731 (1) An applicant for a money transmission license shall
provide, and a licensee at all times shall maintain, security consisting
of a surety bond in a form satisfactory to the director.
(2) The amount of the surety bond required by subsection (1) of this
section shall be the greater of one hundred thousand dollars or an amount
equal to one hundred percent of the licensee's average daily money
transmission liability in this state calculated for the most recently
completed three-month period, up to a maximum of five hundred thousand
dollars. A licensee that maintains a bond in the maximum amount provided
for in this subsection shall not be required to calculate its average
-56-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
daily money transmission liability in this state for purposes of this
subsection.
(3) The surety bond required by subsection (1) of this section shall
remain in effect until cancellation, which may occur only after thirty
days' written notice to the director. Cancellation shall not affect any
liability incurred or accrued during the period the surety bond was in
effect.
(4) Any claimant against the licensee may file a claim or bring suit
directly on the surety bond required by subsection (1) of this section.
The director may also file a claim or bring suit on behalf of any
claimant, either in one action or in successive actions.
(1) In order to promote more effective regulation and reduce the
regulatory burden through supervisory information sharing:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the requirements
under any federal or state law regarding the privacy or confidentiality
of any information or material provided to the Nationwide Mortgage
Licensing System and Registry, and any privilege arising under federal or
state law, including the rules of any federal or state court, with
respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to such
information or material after the information or material has been
disclosed to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry. Such
information and material may be shared with all federal and state
regulatory officials with money transmitter industry oversight authority
without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections
provided by federal or state law;
(b) Information or material that is subject to privilege or
confidentiality under subdivision (a) of this subsection shall not be
subject to:
(i) Disclosure under any federal or state law governing the
disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or an agency
of the federal government or the respective state; or
-57-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(ii) Subpoena or discovery or admission into evidence in any private
civil action or administrative process unless, with respect to any
privilege held by the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry
with respect to such information or material, the person to whom such
information or material pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the
discretion of such person, that privilege;
(c) Any state statute relating to the disclosure of confidential
supervisory information or any information or material described in
subdivision (a) of this subsection that is inconsistent with such
subdivision shall be superseded by the requirements of this section; and
(d) This section shall not apply with respect to the information or
material relating to the employment history of, and publicly adjudicated
disciplinary and enforcement actions against, applicants and licensees
that is included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry
for access by the public.
(2) For these purposes, the director is authorized to enter into
agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the
Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of
Residential Mortgage Regulators, the Money Transmitter Regulators
Association, or other associations representing governmental agencies as
established by adopting and promulgating rules and regulations or an
order of the director.
Sec. 33. Section 8-2732, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2732 (1) A licensee shall maintain at all times permissible
investments that have a market value computed in accordance with United
States generally accepted accounting principles of not less than the
aggregate amount of all of its outstanding money transmission
obligations.
(2) Except for permissible investments described in subsection (1)
of section 8-2733, the director, with respect to any licensee, may, by
-58-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
order, limit the extent to which a specific investment maintained by a
licensee within a class of permissible investments may be considered a
permissible investment, if the specific investment represents undue risk
to customers, not reflected in the market value of the investment.
(3) Permissible investments, even if commingled with other assets of
the licensee, are held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and
holders of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations in
the event of insolvency, the filing of a petition by or against the
licensee under the United States Bankruptcy Code for bankruptcy or
reorganization, the filing of a petition by or against the licensee for
receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or administrative
proceeding for dissolution or reorganization, or in the event of an
action by a creditor against the licensee who is not a beneficiary of
this statutory trust.
(4) No permissible investments held in trust pursuant to subsection
(3) of this section shall be subject to attachment, levy of execution, or
sequestration by order of any court, except for a beneficiary of this
statutory trust.
(5) Funds drawn on a letter of credit, and any other permissible
investments held in trust for the benefit of the purchasers and holders
of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations, are deemed
held in trust for the benefit of such purchasers and holders on a pro
rata and equitable basis for permissible investments required to be held
in this state, and other states, as applicable. Any statutory trust
established under this subsection shall be terminated upon extinguishment
of all of the licensee's outstanding money transmission obligations.
(6) The director, by rule or order, may allow any other type of
investment, that the director determines is of sufficient liquidity and
quality, to be a permissible investment. The director is authorized to
participate in efforts with other state regulators to determine whether
other types of investments are of sufficient liquidity and quality to be
-59-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
a permissible investment.
Each applicant shall submit, with the application, an application
fee of one thousand dollars, and any processing fee allowed under
subsection (2) of section 8-2730 which shall not be subject to refund but
which, if the license is granted, shall constitute the license fee for
the first license year or part thereof.
Sec. 34. Section 8-2733, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2733 (1) The following investments are permissible investments for
the purposes of section 8-2732:
(a) Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds in
such accounts held for the benefit of the licensee's customers in a
federally insured depository financial institution;
(b) Cash equivalents, including automated clearinghouse items in
transit to the licensee, automated clearinghouse items or international
wires in transit to a payee, cash in transit via armored car, cash in
smart safes, cash in licensee-owned locations, debit card-funded or
credit card-funded transmission receivables owed by any financial
institution, or money market mutual funds rated AAA by Standard and
Poor's Corporation or the equivalent from any other eligible rating
service;
(c) Certificates of deposit or senior debt obligations of an insured
depository institution as defined in the Federal Deposit Insurance Act or
an insured credit union as defined in the Federal Credit Union Act;
(d) An obligation of the United States or a commission, agency, or
instrumentality thereof;
(e) An obligation that is guaranteed fully as to principal and
interest by the United States;
(f) An obligation of a state or a governmental subdivision, agency,
or instrumentality thereof; and
(g)(i) The full drawable amount of an irrevocable standby letter of
-60-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
credit, for which the stated beneficiary is the director, that stipulates
that the beneficiary need only draw a sight draft under the letter of
credit and present it to obtain funds up to the letter of credit amount
within seven days after presentation of the items required by this
subdivision.
(ii) The letter of credit shall:
(A) Be issued by a federally insured depository financial
institution, a foreign bank that is authorized under federal law to
maintain a federal agency or federal branch office in a state or states,
or a foreign bank that is authorized under state law to maintain a branch
in a state and such bank bears an eligible rating or whose parent company
bears an eligible rating and is regulated, supervised, and examined by
United States federal or state authorities having regulatory authority
over banks, credit unions, and trust companies;
(B) Be irrevocable and unconditional and indicate that such letter
of credit is not subject to any condition or qualifications outside of
the letter of credit;
(C) Not contain reference to any other agreements, documents, or
entities, or otherwise provide for any security interest in the licensee;
and
(D) Contain an issue date and expiration date and expressly provide
for automatic extension, without a written amendment, for an additional
period of one year from the present or each future expiration date,
unless the issuer of the letter of credit notifies the director in
writing, by certified or registered mail or courier mail or other
receipted means, at least sixty days prior to any expiration date that
the irrevocable letter of credit will not be extended.
(iii) In the event of any notice of expiration or nonextension of a
letter of credit, the licensee shall be required to demonstrate to the
satisfaction of the director, fifteen days prior to expiration, that the
licensee maintains and will maintain permissible investments in
-61-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
accordance with subsection (1) of section 8-2732 upon the expiration of
the letter of credit. If the licensee is not able to do so, the director
may draw on the letter of credit in an amount up to the amount necessary
to meet the licensee's requirements to maintain permissible investments
in accordance with subsection (1) of section 8-2732. Any such draw shall
be offset against the licensee's outstanding money transmission
obligations. The drawn funds shall be held in trust by the director or
the director's designated agent, to the extent authorized by law, as
agent for the benefit of the purchasers and holders of the licensee's
outstanding money transmission obligations.
(iv) The letter of credit shall provide that the issuer of the
letter of credit will honor, at sight, a presentation made by the
beneficiary to the issuer of the following documents on or prior to the
expiration date of the letter of credit:
(A) The original letter of credit, including any amendments; and
(B) A written statement from the beneficiary stating that any of the
following events have occurred:
(I) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under the
United States Bankruptcy Code for bankruptcy or reorganization;
(II) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for
receivership or the commencement of any other judicial or administrative
proceeding for dissolution or reorganization;
(III) The seizure of assets of a licensee by a director pursuant to
an emergency order issued in accordance with applicable law, on the basis
of an action, violation, or condition that has caused or is likely to
cause the insolvency of the licensee; or
(IV) The beneficiary has received notice of expiration or
nonextension of a letter of credit and the licensee failed to demonstrate
to the satisfaction of the beneficiary that the licensee will maintain
permissible investments in accordance with subsection (1) of section
8-2732 upon the expiration or nonextension of the letter of credit.
-62-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(v) The director may designate an agent to serve on the director's
behalf as beneficiary to a letter of credit so long as the agent and
letter of credit meet requirements established by the director. The
director's agent may serve as agent for multiple licensing authorities
for a single irrevocable letter of credit if the proceeds of the drawable
amount for the purposes of this section are assigned to the director.
(vi) The director is authorized to participate in multistate
processes designed to facilitate the issuance and administration of
letters of credit, including, but not limited to, services provided by
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry and State
Regulatory Registry LLC.
(2) Unless permitted by the director, by rule or order, to exceed
the limit as set forth in this section, the following investments are
permissible investments for the purposes of section 8-2732 to the extent
specified:
(a) Receivables that are payable to a licensee from authorized
delegates in the ordinary course of business, received by the authorized
delegates less than seven days old, and combined not exceeding fifty
percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible
investments, and receivables that are payable to a licensee from a single
authorized delegate in the ordinary course of business, received by the
authorized delegate less than seven days before, and combined not
exceeding ten percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total
permissible investments;
(b) The following investment categories are permissible up to twenty
percent of the aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible
investments for each investment category and up to fifty percent of the
aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible investments for all
of the investment categories combined:
(i) A short-term, up to six months, investment bearing an eligible
rating;
-63-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(ii) Commercial paper bearing an eligible rating;
(iii) A bill, note, bond, or debenture bearing an eligible rating;
(iv) A United States tri-party repurchase agreement collateralized
at one hundred percent or more with United States Government or agency
securities, municipal bonds, or other securities bearing an eligible
rating;
(v) A money market mutual fund rated less than AAA and equal to or
higher than A- by Standard and Poor's Corporation, or the equivalent from
any other eligible rating service; and
(vi) A mutual fund or other investment fund composed solely and
exclusively of one or more permissible investments described in
subdivisions (1)(a) through (c) of this section; and
(c) Cash, including demand deposits, savings deposits, and funds in
such accounts held for the benefit of the licensee's customers, at
foreign depository institutions are permissible up to ten percent of the
aggregate value of the licensee's total permissible investments if the
licensee has received a satisfactory rating in the licensee's most recent
examination and the foreign depository institution:
(i) Has an eligible rating;
(ii) Is registered under the Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act;
(iii) Is not located in any country subject to sanctions from the
Office of Foreign Assets Control; and
(iv) Is not located in a high-risk or noncooperative jurisdiction as
designated by the Financial Action Task Force.
(1) Upon the filing of a complete application under the Nebraska
Money Transmitters Act, the director shall investigate the financial
condition and responsibility, financial and business experience,
character, and general fitness of the applicant. The director may conduct
an onsite investigation of the applicant, the reasonable cost of which
shall be borne by the applicant. If the director finds that the
applicant's business will be conducted honestly, fairly, and in a manner
-64-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
commanding the confidence and trust of the community and that the
applicant has fulfilled the requirements imposed by the act and has paid
the required application or license fee, the director shall issue a
license to the applicant authorizing the applicant to engage in money
transmission in this state. If these requirements have not been met, the
director shall deny the application in writing, setting forth the reasons
for the denial.
(2) The director shall approve or deny every application for an
original license within one hundred twenty days after the date a complete
application is submitted, which period may be extended by the written
consent of the applicant. The director shall notify the applicant of the
date when the application is deemed complete.
(3) Any applicant aggrieved by a denial issued by the director under
the act may, at any time within fifteen business days after the date of
the denial, request a hearing before the director. The hearing shall be
held in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act and rules and
regulations of the department.
(4) If an applicant for a license under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act does not complete the license application and fails to
respond to a notice or notices from the department to correct the
deficiency or deficiencies for a period of one hundred twenty days or
more after the date the department sends the initial notice to correct
the deficiency or deficiencies, the department may deem the application
as abandoned and may issue a notice of abandonment of the application to
the applicant in lieu of proceedings to deny the application.
Sec. 35. Section 8-2734, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2734 (1) The director may, following a hearing in accordance with
the Administrative Procedure Act, suspend or revoke a license or order a
licensee to revoke the designation of an authorized delegate if:
(a) The licensee violates the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a
-65-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the
act;
(b) The licensee does not cooperate with an examination or
investigation by the director;
(c) The licensee willfully failed to make any report required by the
act;
(d) The licensee engages in fraud, intentional misrepresentation, or
gross negligence;
(e) An authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state or
federal anti-money laundering statute, or violates a rule or regulation
adopted and promulgated or an order issued under the act, as a result of
the licensee's willful misconduct or willful blindness;
(f) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the
licensee, authorized delegate, person in control of a licensee, key
individual, or responsible person of the authorized delegate indicates
that it is not in the public interest to permit the person to provide
money transmission;
(g) The licensee engages in an unsafe or unsound practice;
(h) The licensee is insolvent, suspends payment of the licensee's
obligations, or makes a general assignment for the benefit of its
creditors; or
(i) The licensee does not remove an authorized delegate after the
director issues and serves upon the licensee a final order including a
finding that the authorized delegate has violated the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act.
(2) In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe or
unsound practice, the director may consider the size and condition of the
licensee's money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of
the violation of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, and the previous
conduct of the person involved.
(3) A licensee may voluntarily surrender a license by delivering to
-66-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
the director written notice of the surrender.
(4) If a licensee fails to maintain a surety bond as required by
section 8-2731, the department may issue a notice of cancellation of the
license in lieu of revocation proceedings.
(5) Suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or expiration
of a license shall not impair or affect the obligation of a preexisting
lawful contract between the licensee and any person.
(6) Suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or expiration
of a license shall not affect civil or criminal liability for acts
committed before the suspension, revocation, cancellation, surrender, or
expiration or liability for any fines which may be levied against the
licensee or any of its key individuals, executive officers, managers,
directors, trustees, or other persons exercising managerial authority of
a licensee for acts committed before the suspension, revocation,
cancellation, surrender, or expiration.
(1) Initial licenses shall remain in full force and effect until the
next succeeding December 31. Each licensee shall, annually on or before
December 31 of each year, file a license renewal application and pay to
the director a license fee of two hundred fifty dollars and any
processing fee allowed under subsection (2) of section 8-2730, both of
which shall not be subject to refund.
(2) The renewal application and license fee shall be accompanied by
a report, in a form prescribed by the director, which shall include:
(a) A copy of the licensee's most recent audited consolidated annual
financial statement including balance sheet, statement of income or loss,
statement of changes in shareholders' equity, and statement of changes in
financial position, or, if a licensee is a wholly owned subsidiary of
another corporation, the consolidated audited annual financial statement
of the parent corporation may be filed in lieu of the licensee's audited
annual financial statement;
(b) The number of payment instruments sold by the licensee in the
-67-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
state, the dollar amount of those instruments, and the dollar amount of
payment instruments currently outstanding, for the most recent quarter
for which data is available before the date of the filing of the renewal
application, but in no event more than one hundred twenty days before the
renewal date;
(c) Any material changes to any of the information submitted by the
licensee on its original application which have not previously been
reported to the director on any other report required to be filed under
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act; and
(d) A list of the licensee's permissible investments.
Sec. 36. Section 8-2735, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
8-2735 (1) The director may issue an order suspending or revoking
the designation of an authorized delegate if the director finds that:
(a) The authorized delegate violated the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued
under the act;
(b) The authorized delegate did not cooperate with an examination or
investigation by the director;
(c) The authorized delegate engaged in fraud, intentional
misrepresentation, or gross negligence;
(d) The authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state
or federal anti-money-laundering statute;
(e) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the
authorized delegate or a person in control of the authorized delegate
indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the authorized
delegate to provide money transmission; or
(f) The authorized delegate is engaging in an unsafe or unsound
practice.
(2) In determining whether an authorized delegate is engaging in an
unsafe or unsound practice, the director may consider the size and
-68-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
condition of the authorized delegate's provision of money transmission,
the magnitude of the loss, the gravity of the violation of the Nebraska
Money Transmitters Act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or
order issued under the act, and the previous conduct of the authorized
delegate.
(3) An authorized delegate may apply for relief from a suspension or
revocation of designation as an authorized delegate according to
procedures prescribed by the director.
(1) A licensee shall file notice with the director within thirty
calendar days after any material change in information provided in a
licensee's application as prescribed by the director.
(2) A licensee shall file a report with the director within five
business days after the licensee has reason to know of the occurrence of
any of the following events:
(a) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee under any
bankruptcy law of the United States for liquidation or reorganization;
(b) The filing of a petition by or against the licensee for
receivership, the commencement of any other judicial or administrative
proceeding for its dissolution or reorganization, or the making of a
general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;
(c) The filing of an action to revoke or suspend the licensee's
license in a state or country in which the licensee engages in business
or is licensed;
(d) The cancellation or other impairment of the licensee's bond or
other security;
(e) A charge or conviction of the licensee or of an executive
officer, manager, or director of, or controlling person of, the licensee,
for a felony; or
(f) A charge or conviction of an authorized delegate for a felony.
(3)(a) Except as provided in subdivisions (b) and (c) of this
subsection, a licensee shall notify the director in writing or through
-69-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry within three
business days from the time that the licensee becomes aware of any breach
of security of the system of computerized data owned or licensed by the
licensee, which contains personal information about a Nebraska resident,
or the unauthorized access to or use of such information about a Nebraska
resident as a result of the breach.
(b) If a licensee would be required under Nebraska law to provide
notification to a Nebraska resident regarding such incident, then the
licensee shall provide a copy of such notification to the department
prior to or simultaneously with the licensee's notification to the
Nebraska resident.
(c) Notice required by this subsection may be delayed if a law
enforcement agency determines that the notice will impede a criminal
investigation. Notice shall be made in good faith, without unreasonable
delay, and as soon as possible after the law enforcement agency
determines that notification will no longer impede the investigation.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, the terms breach of the
security of the system and personal information have the same meaning as
in section 87-802.
Sec. 37. Section 8-2736, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2736 (1) If the director determines that a violation of the
Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or of a rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated or an order issued under the act by a licensee or authorized
delegate is likely to cause immediate and irreparable harm to the
licensee, the licensee's customers, or the public as a result of the
violation, or cause insolvency or significant dissipation of assets of
the licensee, the director may issue an order requiring the licensee or
authorized delegate to cease and desist from the violation. The order
becomes effective upon service of the order upon the licensee or
authorized delegate.
-70-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(2) The director may issue an order against a licensee to cease and
desist from providing money transmission through an authorized delegate
that is the subject of a separate order by the director.
(3) An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable
pending the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(4) A licensee or an authorized delegate that is served with an
order to cease and desist may petition the district court of Lancaster
County for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the
enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the
completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(5) Upon entry of an order to cease and desist, the director shall
promptly notify the affected person that such order has been entered and
provide opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(1) No person acting personally or as an authorized delegate shall
acquire control of any licensee under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act
without first giving thirty days' notice to the director on forms
prescribed by the director of such proposed acquisition.
(2) The director, upon receipt of such notice, shall act upon the
proposed acquisition within thirty days, and unless he or she disapproves
the proposed acquisition within that period of time, the acquisition
shall become effective on the thirty-first day after receipt without the
director's approval, except that the director may extend the thirty-day
period an additional thirty days if, in his or her judgment, any material
information submitted is substantially inaccurate or the acquiring person
has not furnished all the information required by the director.
(3) An acquisition may be made prior to the expiration of the
disapproval period if the director issues written notice of his or her
intent not to disapprove the action.
-71-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(4)(a) The director may disapprove any proposed acquisition if:
(i) The financial condition of any acquiring person is such as might
jeopardize the financial stability of the acquired licensee;
(ii) The business experience, character, and general fitness of any
acquiring person or of any of the proposed management personnel of the
acquiring person indicate that the acquired licensee would not be
operated honestly, carefully, or efficiently; or
(iii) Any acquiring person neglects, fails, or refuses to furnish
all information required by the director.
(b) The director may require that any acquiring person comply with
the application requirements of section 8-2729.
(c) The director shall notify the acquiring person in writing of
disapproval of the acquisition. The notice shall provide a statement of
the basis for the disapproval.
(d) Within fifteen business days after receipt of written notice of
disapproval, the acquiring person may request a hearing on the proposed
acquisition. The hearing shall be in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act and rules and regulations of the department. Following such
hearing, the director shall, by order, approve or disapprove the proposed
acquisition on the basis of the record made at the hearing.
Sec. 38. Section 8-2737, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2737 The director may enter into a consent order at any time with
a person to resolve a matter arising under the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or order
issued under the act. A consent order shall be signed by the person to
whom the order is issued or by the person's authorized representative,
and shall indicate agreement with the terms contained in the order. A
consent order may provide that it does not constitute an admission by a
person that the act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an
order issued under the act has been violated. (1) The director may
-72-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
conduct an examination of a licensee upon reasonable written notice to
the licensee. The director may examine a licensee without prior notice if
the director has a reasonable basis to believe that the licensee is in
noncompliance with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(2) An examination may be conducted in conjunction with examinations
to be performed by representatives of agencies of another state or states
or departments or agencies of the United States. The director, in lieu of
an examination, may accept the examination report of an agency of another
state or a department or an agency of the United States or a report
prepared by an independent accounting firm. Reports so accepted are
considered for all purposes as an official report of the department.
(3) The director may make investigations regarding complaints of
alleged violations of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, any rule and
regulation or order under the act, or any state or federal law applicable
to a licensee, an authorized delegate, or an applicant for a license, as
the director deems necessary, and to the extent necessary for this
purpose, the director may examine such licensee, authorized delegate, or
any other person, interview officers, principals, employees, and
customers of the licensee, authorized delegate, or applicant, and compel
the production of all relevant books, records, accounts, and documents.
(4) The director may request financial data from a licensee in
addition to that required under section 8-2734.
(5) The director may conduct an examination of any authorized
delegate of a licensee within this state upon reasonable written notice
to the licensee and the authorized delegate. The director may conduct an
examination of any authorized delegate without prior notice to the
authorized delegate or licensee only if the director has a reasonable
basis to believe that the licensee or authorized delegate is in
noncompliance with the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.
(6) Upon receipt by a licensee, an authorized delegate, or any other
person of a notice of investigation or inquiry request for information
-73-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
from the department, the licensee, authorized delegate, or other person
shall respond within twenty-one calendar days. Failure to respond is a
violation of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act. Each day a licensee,
authorized delegate, or other person fails to respond as required by this
subsection shall constitute a separate violation.
(7) If the director finds, after notice and opportunity for hearing
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act, that any person has
violated subsection (6) of this section, the director may order such
person to pay (a) an administrative fine of not more than two thousand
dollars for each separate violation and (b) the costs of investigation.
The department shall remit fines collected under this subsection to the
State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(8) If a person fails to pay an administrative fine and the costs of
investigation ordered pursuant to subsection (7) of this section, a lien
in the amount of such fine and costs may be imposed upon all assets and
property of such person in this state and may be recovered in a civil
action by the director. The lien shall attach to the real property of
such person when notice of the lien is filed and indexed against the real
property in the office of the register of deeds in the county where the
real property is located. The lien shall attach to any other property of
such person when notice of the lien is filed against the property in the
manner prescribed by law. Failure of the person to pay such fine and
costs shall constitute a separate violation of the Nebraska Money
Transmitters Act.
(9) For purposes of any investigation, examination, or proceeding
under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act, the director or any officer
designated by the director may administer oaths and affirmations,
subpoena witnesses, compel attendance, take evidence, and require the
production of any books, papers, correspondence, memoranda, agreements,
or other documents or records which the director deems relevant or
-74-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
material to the inquiry. If any person refuses to comply with a subpoena
issued under this subsection or to testify with respect to any matter
relevant to the proceeding, the district court of Lancaster County may,
on application of the director, issue an order requiring the person to
comply with the subpoena and to testify. Failure to obey an order of the
court to comply with the subpoena may be punished by the court as civil
contempt.
(10) The total charge for an examination under this section shall be
paid by the licensee or authorized delegate as set forth in sections
8-605 and 8-606.
Sec. 39. Section 8-2738, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2738 (1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this
section, any person violating the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or any
rule, regulation, or order of the director adopted, promulgated, or
issued pursuant to the act or who engages in any act, practice, or
transaction declared by the act to be unlawful is guilty of a Class III
misdemeanor.
(2) A person who intentionally makes a false statement,
misrepresentation, or false certification in a record filed or required
to be maintained under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or who
intentionally makes a false entry or omits a material entry in such a
record is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(3) An individual who knowingly engages in money transmission for
which a license is required under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act
without being licensed under the act is guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(1) Each licensee shall make, keep, and preserve the following
books, accounts, and other records for a period of three years which
shall be open to inspection by the director:
(a) A record of each payment instrument and stored value sold;
(b) A general ledger containing all assets, liability, capital,
-75-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
income, and expense accounts, which general ledger shall be posted at
least monthly;
(c) Settlement sheets received from authorized delegates;
(d) Bank statements and bank reconciliation records;
(e) Records of outstanding payment instruments and stored value;
(f) Records of each payment instrument and stored value paid;
(g) A list of the names and addresses of all of the licensee's
authorized delegates; and
(h) Any other records the director reasonably requires by rule or
regulation or order.
(2) Maintenance of such documents as are required by this section in
a photographic, electronic, or other similar form constitutes compliance
with this section.
(3) Records may be maintained at a location other than within this
state so long as the records are made accessible to the director on seven
business days' written notice.
Sec. 40. Section 8-2739, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2739 The director may assess a fine against a person that violates
the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act or a rule or regulation adopted and
promulgated or an order issued under the act in an amount not to exceed
five thousand dollars per violation per day for each day the violation is
outstanding, plus the department's and the State of Nebraska's costs and
expenses for the investigation and prosecution of the matter, including
reasonable attorney's fees. A licensee desiring to conduct money
transmission through an authorized delegate shall authorize each
authorized delegate to operate pursuant to an express written contract
which, for contracts entered into on or after January 1, 2014, shall
provide the following:
(1) That the licensee appoints the person as its authorized delegate
with authority to engage in the sale and issue of payment instruments or
-76-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
engage in the business of money transmission on behalf of the licensee;
(2) That neither a licensee nor an authorized delegate may authorize
subdelegates without the written consent of the director; and
(3) That the licensee is subject to supervision and regulation by
the director.
Sec. 41. Section 8-2740, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2740 (1) If the director has reason to believe that a person has
violated or is violating section 8-2709, the director may issue an order
to cease and desist requiring that the person cease and desist from the
violation of section 8-2709.
(2) In an emergency, the director may petition the district court of
Lancaster County for the issuance of a temporary restraining order ex
parte pursuant to the rules of civil procedure.
(3) An order to cease and desist becomes effective when issued by
the director.
(4) An order to cease and desist remains effective and enforceable
pending the completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(5) A person that is served with an order to cease and desist for
violating section 8-2709 may petition the district court of Lancaster
County for a judicial order setting aside, limiting, or suspending the
enforcement, operation, or effectiveness of the order pending the
completion of an administrative proceeding pursuant to the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(6) Upon entry of an order to cease and desist, the director shall
promptly notify the affected person that such order has been entered and
provide opportunity for hearing in accordance with the Administrative
Procedure Act.
(1) An authorized delegate shall not make any fraudulent or false
statement or misrepresentation to a licensee or to the director.
-77-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(2) An authorized delegate shall conduct all money transmission
strictly in accordance with the licensee's written procedures provided to
the authorized delegate.
(3) An authorized delegate shall remit all money owing to the
licensee in accordance with the terms of the contract between the
licensee and the authorized delegate.
(4) An authorized delegate is deemed to consent to the director's
inspection with or without prior notice to the licensee or authorized
delegate.
(5) An authorized delegate is under a duty to act only as authorized
under the contract with the licensee and the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act. An authorized delegate who exceeds its authority is subject to
cancellation of its contract and further disciplinary action by the
director.
(6) All funds, less fees, received by an authorized delegate of a
licensee from the sale or delivery of a payment instrument issued by a
licensee or received by an authorized delegate for transmission shall,
from the time such funds are received by such authorized delegate until
such time when the funds or an equivalent amount are remitted by the
authorized delegate to the licensee, constitute trust funds owned by and
belonging to the licensee. If an authorized delegate commingles any such
funds with any other funds or property owned or controlled by the
authorized delegate, all commingled proceeds and other property is
impressed with a trust in favor of the licensee in an amount equal to the
amount of the proceeds due the licensee.
Sec. 42. Section 8-2741, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2741 (1) The department shall remit all fees, charges, and costs
collected by the department pursuant to the Nebraska Money Transmitters
Act to the State Treasurer for credit to the Financial Institution
Assessment Cash Fund.
-78-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(2) The department shall remit fines collected under the act to the
State Treasurer for distribution in accordance with Article VII, section
5, of the Constitution of Nebraska.
(1) The director may, following a hearing in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, suspend or revoke any license issued
pursuant to the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act if he or she finds:
(a) Any fact or condition exists that, if it had existed at the time
when the licensee applied for its original or renewal license, would have
been grounds for denying such application;
(b) The licensee's net worth has become inadequate and the licensee,
after ten days' written notice from the director, failed to take such
steps as the director deems necessary to remedy such deficiency;
(c) The licensee knowingly violated any material provision of the
act or any rule or order validly adopted and promulgated under the act;
(d) The licensee conducted money transmission in an unsafe or
unsound manner;
(e) The licensee is insolvent;
(f) The licensee has suspended payment of its obligations, made an
assignment for the benefit of its creditors, or admitted in writing its
inability to pay its debts as they became due;
(g) The licensee filed for liquidation or reorganization under any
bankruptcy law;
(h) The licensee refused to permit the director to make any
examination authorized by the act; or
(i) The licensee willfully failed to make any report required by the
act.
(2) In determining whether a licensee is engaging in an unsafe or
unsound practice, the director may consider the size and condition of the
licensee's money transmission, the magnitude of the loss, if any, the
gravity of the violation of the act, and the previous conduct of the
licensee.
-79-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(3) A licensee may voluntarily surrender a license by delivering to
the director written notice of the surrender, but a surrender shall not
affect civil or criminal liability for acts committed before the
surrender or liability for any fines which may be levied against the
licensee or any of its officers, directors, key shareholders, partners,
or members for acts committed before the surrender.
(4)(a) If a licensee fails to renew its license as required by
section 8-2734 and does not voluntarily surrender the license pursuant to
this section, the department may issue a notice of expiration of the
license to the licensee in lieu of revocation proceedings.
(b) If a licensee fails to maintain a surety bond as required by
section 8-2727, the department may issue a notice of cancellation of the
license in lieu of revocation proceedings.
(5) Revocation, suspension, surrender, cancellation, or expiration
of a license shall not impair or affect the obligation of a preexisting
lawful contract between the licensee and any person.
(6) Revocation, suspension, cancellation, or expiration of a license
shall not affect civil or criminal liability for acts committed before
the revocation, suspension, cancellation, or expiration or liability for
any fines which may be levied against the licensee or any of its
officers, directors, key shareholders, partners, or members for acts
committed before the revocation, suspension, cancellation, or expiration.
Sec. 43. Section 8-2742, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-2742 For purposes of the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act:
(1) 31 C.F.R. part 1010.100 means 31 C.F.R. Section 1010.100, as
such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(2) Bank Secrecy Act means the Bank Secrecy Act, 31 U.S.C. 5311, et
seq., and the implementing regulations of such act, as such act and
regulations existed on January 1, 2025;
(3) Bank Service Corporation Act means the Bank Service Corporation
-80-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
Act, 25 12 U.S.C. 1861 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(4) Edge Act means the Edge Act, 12 U.S.C. 611 et seq., as such act
existed on January 1, 2025;
(5) Federal Commodity Exchange Act means the Federal Commodity
Exchange Act, 7 U.S.C. 1 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(6) Federal Credit Union Act means the Federal Credit Union Act, 12
U.S.C. Section 1751, et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(7) Federal Deposit Insurance Act means the Federal Deposit
Insurance Act, 12 U.S.C. Section 1811, et seq., as such act existed on
January 1, 2025;
(8) Federal remittance rule means to 12 C.F.R. part 1005 subpart B,
as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(9) Foreign Account Tax Compliance Act means the Foreign Account Tax
Compliance Act, 26 U.S.C. 1471 et seq., as such act existed on January 1,
2025;
(10) International Bank Act means the International Bank Act of
1978, 12 U.S.C. 3101 et seq., as such act existed on January 1, 2025;
(11) Securities Exchange Act of 1934 means the Securities Exchange
Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. 78a et seq., as such act existed on January 1,
2025;
(12) United States Bankruptcy Code means 11 U.S.C. 101 et seq., as
such sections existed on January 1, 2025; and
(13) Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate
Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001 means the
Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required
to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, Public Law 107-56, as
such act existed on January 1, 2025.
(1) The director may, following a hearing in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, issue an order suspending or revoking the
designation of an authorized delegate if the director finds that:
(a) The authorized delegate violated the Nebraska Money Transmitters
-81-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
Act or a rule or regulation adopted and promulgated or an order issued
under the act;
(b) The authorized delegate did not cooperate with an examination or
investigation by the director;
(c) The authorized delegate engaged in fraud, intentional
misrepresentation, or gross negligence;
(d) The authorized delegate is convicted of a violation of a state
or federal anti-money laundering statute;
(e) The competence, experience, character, or general fitness of the
authorized delegate or a controlling person of the authorized delegate
indicates that it is not in the public interest to permit the authorized
delegate to engage in money transmission services; or
(f) The authorized delegate is engaged in an unsafe or unsound
practice.
(2) In determining whether an authorized delegate is engaging in an
unsafe or unsound practice, the director may consider the size and
condition of the authorized delegate's money transmission, the magnitude
of the loss, if any, the gravity of the violation of the act, and the
previous conduct of the authorized delegate.
(3) Any authorized delegate to whom a final order is issued under
this section may apply to the director to modify or rescind the order.
The director shall not grant the application unless the director finds
that (a) it is in the public interest to do so and (b) it is reasonable
to believe that the person will comply with the act and any rule,
regulation, or order issued under the act if and when that person is
permitted to resume being an authorized delegate of a licensee.
Sec. 44. Section 8-3025, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
8-3025 The director may suspend or revoke the charter of a digital
asset depository if, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, the
director determines that:
-82-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
(1) The digital asset depository has failed or refused to comply
with an order issued under section 8-1,136, 8-2504, or 8-2740 8-2743;
(2) The application for a charter contained a materially false
statement, misrepresentation, or omission; or
(3) An officer, a director, or an agent of the digital asset
depository, in connection with an application for a charter, an
examination, a report, or other document filed with the director,
knowingly made a materially false statement, misrepresentation, or
omission to the department, the director, or the duly authorized agent of
the department or director.
Sec. 45. Section 8-3027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
8-3027 (1) If the director finds that a digital asset depository has
failed, is operating in an unsafe or unsound condition, or is endangering
the interests of customers, and the failure, unsafe or unsound condition,
or endangerment has not been remedied within the time prescribed under
section 8-1,117 or as directed by order of the director issued pursuant
to section 8-1,136, 8-2504, or 8-2740 8-2743, the director shall conduct
a liquidation or appoint a receiver as provided by sections 8-198,
8-1,100, and 8-1,102.
(2) For purposes of this section:
(a) Failed or failure means, consistent with an order or rules and
regulations of the director, a circumstance when a digital asset
depository has not:
(i) Complied with the requirements of section 8-3009;
(ii) Maintained capital and surplus as required by section 8-3013;
or
(iii) Paid, in the manner commonly accepted by business practices,
its legal obligations to customers on demand or to discharge any
promissory notes, or other indebtedness when due; and
(b) Unsafe or unsound condition means, consistent with an order or
-83-

LB473 LB473
2025 2025
rules and regulations of the director, a circumstance relating to a
digital asset depository which is likely to:
(i) Cause the failure of the digital asset depository;
(ii) Cause a substantial dissipation of assets or earnings;
(iii) Substantially disrupt the services provided by the digital
asset depository to customers; or
(iv) Otherwise substantially prejudice the interests of customers of
the digital asset depository.
Sec. 46. This act becomes operative on October 1, 2025.
Sec. 47. Original sections 8-2701, 8-2702, 8-2703, 8-2704, 8-2705,
8-2706, 8-2707, 8-2708, 8-2709, 8-2710, 8-2711, 8-2712, 8-2713, 8-2714,
8-2715, 8-2716, 8-2717, 8-2718, 8-2719, 8-2720, 8-2721, 8-2722, 8-2723,
8-2725, 8-2726, 8-2727, 8-2728, 8-2731, 8-2732, 8-2733, 8-2734, 8-2736,
8-2737, 8-2738, 8-2739, 8-2740, 8-2741, 8-2742, and 8-3027, Reissue
Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 8-602, 8-2724, 8-2729, 8-2730,
8-2735, and 8-3025, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
Sec. 48. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections
8-2743, 8-2744, 8-2745, 8-2746, and 8-2747, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska.
-84-